Concordia Novel Coronavirus Pneumonia Protection Manual

Catalog


Chapter 1: Understanding novel coronavirus pneumonia   

1. Introduction to the novel coronavirus

2. Current status of the epidemic of novel coronavirus pneumonia at home and abroad

3. Hazardous nature of the novel coronavirus

4. Channels of transmission of novel coronaviruses

Chapter 2: Symptoms, medical consultation, isolation, treatment

1. Symptoms

2. Access to medical care

3. Isolation

4. Treatment

Chapter 3 Preventive measures

1. Universal precautions

2. Personal precautions

3. Family preventive measures

4. Community prevention strategies and measures	

5. Preventive measures in public places	

6. Special place precautions

Chapter 4 Special Populations Prevention

1. Elderly people

2. children

3. Maternity

4. medical and nursing staff

Chapter 5 Psychological Support

1. Patients

2. Home isolated persons

3. rescuers

4. General public

5. Children

Chapter 6 Nutrition campaign recommendations for protection against novel coronavirus pneumonia

1. Exercise and nutrition support for the general population

2. Exercise and dietary management during recovery from common pneumonia or pneumonia         


Preface


      Since December 2019, several cases of novel infectious diseases caused by novel coronavirus infection with predominantly pulmonary lesions have been detected in Wuhan, Hubei Province. As the outbreak spreads, such cases have been identified in other regions of China and outside China. The clinical features of this viral infection are fever, dry cough, shortness of breath, generally low or decreased peripheral blood leukocytes, and inflammatory changes on chest radiographs. The World Health Organization (WHO) confirmed and named its pathogen as COVID-19, a novel coronavirus belonging to the genus β. It was designated as a Public Health Emergency of International Concern (PHEIC) on January 31, 2020.


      In order to improve the knowledge and understanding of the general public and related industries about the novel coronavirus pneumonia, guide personal prevention, reduce the risk of transmission, and prevent the disease scientifically, our society has urgently organized the compilation of the book "Concordia Novel Coronavirus Pneumonia Protection Manual". The book is divided into six parts: understanding novel coronavirus pneumonia, symptoms, medical care, isolation, treatment, preventive measures, prevention for special populations, psychological support, and nutritional advice for novel coronavirus pneumonia protection, to answer the public's questions in the fight against novel coronavirus pneumonia.


      The elderly, children and pregnant women are the groups that need special attention in the prevention and control of novel coronavirus pneumonia outbreaks. Therefore, we have developed specific protective measures for these populations, which we hope will be useful.


      Please refer to the latest version provided by the QR code at the end of this article for any inaccuracies in the following contents. If there are any errors, please feel free to correct them.





Coronavirus (CoV) belongs to Nidovirales, Coro⁃naviridae, Orthocoronavirinae, and is a class of RNA viruses with a capsid and a linear single-stranded positive-stranded genome. The viral genome has a methylated capsid structure at the 5′ end and a poly(A) tail at the 3′ end, and the genome is 27-32 kb in length, which is the largest genome of any RNA virus known to date. Coronaviruses are widespread in nature and are named for the presence of many small protrusions (spines) on the exterior of the virus, resembling a corolla (Figure 1).


Coronaviruses infect only vertebrates and are associated with a wide range of diseases in humans and animals, causing multiple systemic disease manifestations including respiratory, digestive and neurological diseases as well as cardiovascular system in humans and animals.

According to the phylogenetic tree, coronaviruses can be divided into four genera: α, β, γ, and δ, where β genus coronaviruses can be further divided into four independent subgroups A, B, C, and D groups. Animal coronaviruses include mammalian coronaviruses and avian coronaviruses. Mammalian coronaviruses are mainly α and β genus coronaviruses, which can infect a variety of animals including bats, pigs, dogs, cats, rats, cattle, horses, etc. Avian coronaviruses mainly originate from γ and δ genus coronaviruses, which can cause disease in a variety of avian species such as chickens, turkeys, sparrows, ducks, geese and pigeons.

Coronaviruses that can infect humans are referred to as human coronaviruses. To date, in addition to the novel coronavirus that caused the current outbreak of viral pneumonia in Wuhan, a total of 6 human infectious coronaviruses (HCoV-229E, HCoV-OC43, SARS-CoV, HCoV-NL63, HCoV-HKU1 and MERS-CoV) have been identified. Among them, four coronaviruses cause common human infections but are less pathogenic and generally cause only mild respiratory symptoms similar to the common cold; the other two coronaviruses - severe acute respiratory syndrome coronavirus and Middle East respiratory syndrome coronavirus, also commonly known as SARS coronavirus and MERS coronavirus can cause severe respiratory diseases. According to the World Health Organization (WHO) and domestic experts, the source of the viral pneumonia outbreak was the seventh member of the coronavirus family, which was named COVID-19 by WHO on February 11, where "Co" stands for "coronavirus" and "Vi" stands for "coronavirus. On February 11, the World Health Organization named it COVID-19, where "Co" stands for "coronavirus", "Vi" for "virus", and "D" for "disease". On the same day, the International Committee on Taxonomy of Viruses (ICTV) announced its official classification as SARS-CoV-2, which is the same "species" as SARS virus. A Chinese research team discovered that the new coronavirus has recently generated 149 mutation sites and evolved two subtypes, subtype L and subtype S. It was found that these two subtypes showed great measurement differences in terms of geographical distribution and proportion in the population. The S subtype is relatively old, while the L subtype is more aggressive and more infectious. An in-depth understanding of the different subtypes will help to differentiate the treatment and prevention and control of NCCP.

Most of the knowledge on the physicochemical properties of human coronaviruses comes from studies on SARS-CoV and MERS-CoV. Coronaviruses are sensitive to heat and are moderately stable in suitable maintenance solution at 4°C and can be stored for several years at -60°C. However, the activity of the virus decreases with increasing temperature, e.g., HCoV-229E can lose its infectivity at 56°C for 10 minutes or 37°C for several hours, SARS-CoV can survive for 4 days at 37°C, and heating at 56°C for 90 minutes and 75°C for 30 minutes can inactivate the virus. virus. Human coronaviruses are not acid- or alkali-resistant, and the optimal pH for virus replication is 7.2. They are sensitive to organic solvents and disinfectants, and 75% alcohol, ether, chloroform, formaldehyde, chlorinated disinfectants, peroxyacetic acid and UV light can inactivate the virus. Among human coronaviruses, SARS-CoV can survive for at least 10 days in urine at room temperature of 24°C, more than 5 days in sputum and feces of patients with diarrhea, and about 15 days in blood, and 2-3 days on the surfaces of various objects such as plastic, glass, mosaic, metal, fabric and copy paper.

At present, the survival time of novel coronavirus at room temperature is unknown, but it has great similarity to SARS virus and many analogies can be drawn: for example, it is heat sensitive and can be inactivated at 56°C for 30 minutes, while organic solvents and disinfectants such as 75% alcohol, peracetic acid, chlorine-containing disinfectants (except chlorhexidine) are effective in killing novel coronavirus, and UV light can also inactivate the virus.




The new coronavirus pneumonia outbreak started in Wuhan and has spread rapidly since then, and is now spreading rapidly in many countries around the world. As of 24:00 Beijing time on March 10, the National Health and Welfare Commission received cumulative reports from 31 provinces (autonomous regions and municipalities directly under the Central Government) and the Xinjiang Production and Construction Corps that there were 16,145 confirmed cases (including 4,492 severe cases), 61,475 cumulative cured cases, 3,158 cumulative deaths, 80,778 cumulative reported confirmed cases, and 285 existing suspected cases. A total of 675,886 close contacts have been traced, and 14,607 close contacts are still under medical observation. There were 13 new confirmed cases in Hubei (13 cases in Wuhan), 1,471 new cured cases (1,212 cases in Wuhan), 22 new deaths (19 cases in Wuhan), and 15,671 confirmed cases (14,514 cases in Wuhan), including 4,412 serious cases (4,217 cases in Wuhan). There were 49,056 cumulative cured cases (Wuhan 33,041 cases), 3,046 cumulative deaths (Wuhan 2,423 cases), and 67,773 cumulative confirmed cases (Wuhan 49,978 cases). There were 6 new suspected cases (6 in Wuhan) and 198 existing suspected cases (192 in Wuhan). 10 new confirmed cases were reported from 0-24 March 10 (6 in Beijing, 2 in Shanghai, 1 in Shandong and 1 in Gansu). As of 24:00 on March 10, a total of 79 confirmed cases were reported from overseas. A total of 177 confirmed cases were received from Hong Kong, Macao and Taiwan: 120 cases in Hong Kong SAR (65 discharged, 3 deaths), 10 cases in Macao SAR (10 discharged), and 47 cases in Taiwan (17 discharged, 1 death).

The country's daily new confirmed cases and new suspected cases remained in double digits for five consecutive days, except for Wuhan in the last five days, two new confirmed cases locally, the epidemic overall remains at a low level, the prevention and control situation continues to improve. However, the number of confirmed cases in Hubei and Wuhan is still high, the task of prevention and control of the epidemic is still arduous and heavy, and the rapid development of the epidemic abroad brings uncertainty, so we must make further efforts, do our best, continue to grasp the two positions of hospitals and communities, and be confident to overcome the epidemic.

As of 21:00 Beijing time on March 8, 74 countries and regions worldwide were affected by the outbreak. There are 26,210 cumulative confirmed cases outside of China, 22,522 existing confirmed cases, 549 cumulative deaths, and 3,139 cumulative cured cases. With the overall number of infections in China gradually decreasing, the novel coronavirus is now spreading rapidly in other parts of the world mainly outside of China, especially in countries such as South Korea, Italy and Iran, where more than 5,000 cases have been confirmed. The World Health Organization (WHO) officially announced at a press conference in Geneva on March 11 that the new coronavirus pneumonia (COVID-19) was classified as a global pandemic, the last time it was also classified as a global pandemic was influenza A (H1N1) in 2009, which was the first time coronavirus infection was assessed as a global pandemic. SARS in 2003 did not reach this level either. The new coronavirus has entered global pandemic status. This is another escalation of the epidemic trend of the new coronavirus following the WHO's declaration on January 31, Beijing time that this new coronavirus outbreak in China constitutes a public health emergency of international concern (Public Health Emergency of International Concern, PHEIC). In a March 11 release, WHO noted that "in the past two weeks, the number of COVID-19 cases outside China has increased 13-fold and the number of countries affected by the outbreak has increased two-fold. There are now more than 118,000 confirmed cases in 114 countries worldwide, with a cumulative total of 4,291 unfortunate deaths. In the coming weeks, we believe that the number of confirmed cases, the number of deaths and the number of countries affected by the outbreak will climb further ...... Therefore, we conduct an assessment that COVID-19 can be considered a pandemic."





With the development of the epidemic, people have gradually become more aware of the harmful effects of the virus. As with SARS, the new coronavirus is a general susceptibility of the population. Young adults are less ill after infection, and may only show symptoms such as low fever and malaise; the elderly and those with underlying diseases are more ill after infection, and even show heavy or critical illness, with a poorer prognosis; children are susceptible to the new coronavirus, but have relatively mild symptoms after infection, and are much less likely to become seriously ill. The virus easily attacks human lung tissue and causes "pneumonia". Further research is needed to determine whether infection is immunogenic; the proportion of true asymptomatic infections is not known, but is relatively rare and is not a major driver of transmission.

Lung and immune system damage is predominant after neo-coronavirus infection. Other organs vary depending on the underlying disease and are mostly secondary to damage.2020 From February 16 to 24, 2020, a team from Huazhong University of Science and Technology completed the pathologic autopsy of the remains of nine cases of new coronavirus pneumonia. A report on the gross observations of the systematic autopsy of dead bodies with novel coronavirus pneumonia was published in the February 2020 advance issue of the Journal of Forensic Medicine. The report showed that the lesions of the new coronavirus infection remained focused on the lungs, considering that the ground glass-like shadow seen on imaging corresponded to the grayish-white lesions of the alveoli seen with the naked eye, suggesting that new coronavirus pneumonia mainly caused an inflammatory response characterized by deep airway and alveolar damage; the fibrosis and solid changes in the lungs were not as severe as those caused by SARS, while the exudative response was more pronounced than that of SARS, which may be related to the fact that this patient had only 15 days from diagnosis to death and the disease duration This may be related to the shorter duration of illness from diagnosis to death in this patient.

In addition, regarding the nervous system, the report concluded that cerebral edema and mild atrophy of the cerebral cortex were seen on visual inspection. Combined with the clinical data, the patient was old, had multiple cerebral infarcts and sequelae of cerebrovascular disease, no infection-specific manifestations were seen on visual inspection of the brain, and whether the virus invaded the central nervous system is to be verified histopathologically. Further studies are needed to determine whether there are signs of damage to the myocardium and epicardium, kidneys, spleen, and gastrointestinal organs associated with viral infection.




Usually the virus is transmitted in several ways: first, droplet transmission, through droplets generated by coughing, sneezing, and talking into susceptible mucosal surfaces; second, contact transmission: touching one's mouth, nose, or eyes after touching something an infected person has touched leads to virus transmission; third, aerosol transmission: the possibility of transmission exists when the pathogen is exposed to high concentrations of aerosols in a relatively closed environment for a long time; and Viral nucleic acids can be detected in the stool of patients with confirmed novel coronavirus, suggesting the possible presence of the virus, but there is no clear evidence of a gastrointestinal mode of transmission. For novel coronaviruses, isolation and protection measures for each of these routes should be done.

The "Treatment protocol for novel coronavirus pneumonia (trial version 7)" issued by the National Health and Wellness Commission specifies that droplet transmission via the respiratory tract is the main route of novel coronavirus transmission. Infected persons cough, sneeze and talk when they discharge secretions and droplets, and susceptible persons inhale and become infected, but droplets have a limited distance of transmission in the air, and the activity of the virus decreases significantly after 2 hours. However, it has been suggested that novel coronaviruses can also be transmitted through aerosols, where droplets are mixed in the air to form aerosols that can remain in the air for a long period of time and be inhaled by humans and infected. The environment where the risk of aerosol exposure is high is in hospitals, where it is generated during operations such as tracheal intubation/extraction, chest compressions, bronchoscopy, and nebulizer therapy. In addition, droplets can settle on the surfaces of surrounding objects or through indirect contact, and the virus enters the body through the eyes, nasal and oral mucosa. Currently, some studies have isolated novel coronaviruses in the feces and urine of infected patients, and attention should be paid to fecal and urine contamination of the environment causing aerosol or contact transmission.

Although respiratory droplet transmission is the main route of transmission of novel coronavirus, contact transmission is also one of the routes of transmission of novel coronavirus. Direct contact transmission refers to the infection of susceptible people who come into contact with various body secretions of patients, such as saliva, tears, urine, vomit and other secretions and excretions.

Although there are no experimental studies to determine the concentration of the virus in body fluids and excretions of patients, the general public is still advised to avoid contact with the secretions and excretions of patients, or to avoid contact with all secretions and excretions of others for precautionary reasons. In case of inadvertent contact, disinfection should be carried out promptly. Many studies have shown that there is indirect contact transmission of novel coronaviruses. Some studies have shown that novel coronavirus can survive for several hours on smooth surfaces such as door handles and elevator buttons, and even for several days if the temperature (22-25°C) and humidity (40%-50%) are suitable, suggesting attention to environmental disinfection.

Recently, studies have demonstrated the possibility of aerosol transmission of novel coronavirus, and health care should take the necessary precautions. For non-medical personnel, aerosol transmission is an extremely rare mode of transmission. However, viral nucleic acid can be detected in the feces of patients with confirmed novel coronavirus, so care should be taken to cover the toilet lid when flushing the toilet, disinfect the toilet regularly, and pay attention to the disinfection treatment of sewage in the sewer system in all communities and villages with confirmed or suspected cases.

Recent reports indicate that, following several cases of novel coronavirus infection in children, cases of novel coronavirus infection in newborns have been identified. on February 5, 2020, two cases of novel coronavirus pneumonia in newborns were diagnosed in Tongji Hospital, affiliated with Tongji Medical College of Huazhong University of Science and Technology, with the youngest diagnosed being born just 30 hours ago. Although there is no definite evidence of vertical mother-to-child transmission of novel coronavirus, the possibility of vertical transmission still exists and needs to be given high priority.

For the traceability of the novel coronavirus, on February 29, the National Health Commission released the "China-WHO Joint Expedition Report on Novel Coronavirus Pneumonia (COVID-19)" in which it was mentioned that bats appear to be the host of the virus, but intermediate hosts have not been identified. The identification of an intermediate host requires a rigorous and recognized scientific process, including: isolation of a replicating virus in the intermediate host; isolation of a virus that can show pathogenicity and pathological characteristics in an animal model; confirmation of the position of the virus in the chain of infection transmission (is it transmitted to humans by animals carrying the virus, or to animals by humans who have already transmitted the virus?) etc. In conclusion, the current study has not been able to identify the intermediate host of this novel coronavirus and further scientific studies are needed.





Novel coronavirus pneumonia is characterized by fever, malaise, and dry cough. A small number of patients have symptoms such as nasal congestion, runny nose and diarrhea. More than half of the patients may present with dyspnea. Patients with the mild form only present with low-grade fever and mild malaise, with no pneumonia manifestations. Patients with the common type have imaging signs of pneumonia. Patients with mild and common forms need to be monitored closely, and some patients may progress to severe disease. Severely ill patients tend to develop respiratory distress and/or hypoxemia 1 week after onset, and in severe cases, rapid onset of acute respiratory distress syndrome, septic shock, uncorrectable metabolic acidosis and coagulopathy, and multi-organ failure. A small number of patients with severe and critical illnesses may have moderate to low fever or even no significant fever during the course of the disease. Some patients only present with low-grade fever and mild malaise, without pneumonia manifestations, and mostly recover after 1 week.

Current epidemiological surveys show that the incubation period of novel coronaviruses is 1 to 14 days, mostly 3 to 7 days. The incubation period is infectious, which means that during the time when individuals have been infected with the virus but have not developed the disease, there is also the possibility of infecting others, which increases the difficulty of controlling the outbreak.

In the early stages of novel coronavirus pneumonia, patients may present with symptoms such as headache, nasal congestion, sneezing and coughing, similar to the flu and the common cold. However, there is actually a clear difference between them.




(1) Suspected symptoms in yourself or your family

If you or your family members develop: ① symptoms of acute respiratory infection such as fever (axillary body temperature ≥37.3℃), cough, shortness of breath, etc., ② history of travel or residence in Wuhan or other areas with persistent transmission of local cases, or have been in contact with patients with fever with respiratory symptoms from Wuhan or other areas with persistent transmission of local cases within 14 days before the onset of fever, ③ emergence of aggregated illness (within 2 weeks in a small area such as home, office, school class, etc., with 2 or more cases of fever and/or respiratory symptoms), you should go to the fever clinic of the designated hospital for consultation.

Wear a mask throughout the journey to the doctor, avoid public transportation, take a private car or call an ambulance, and stay as far away as possible from other people (at least 1 meter) on the road and in the hospital. When seeking medical attention, you should give a detailed account of your illness and the process of seeking medical attention. In particular, you should inform the doctor of your recent history of travel and residence in Wuhan, your history of contact with patients or suspected patients with pneumonia, and your history of animal contact. Before and after seeking medical attention, you may refer to "(1) Home environment" and "(2) Private car" in Chapter 3, "3. Home precautions" to clean and disinfect the surrounding environment.

Upon arrival at the fever clinic, the nurse will measure the temperature for a temperature above 37.3°C and ask for an epidemiological history. For patients with fever and an epidemiological history, the doctor will arrange for routine blood tests, liver and kidney functions, cardiac enzymes, and X-ray chest radiographs. Once the test results are available, the fever clinic doctor will make a judgment based on the results, and if novel coronavirus pneumonia is suspected, the hospital will request a consultation with a specialist. During this period, febrile patients will be placed in isolation for observation. If novel coronavirus pneumonia is suspected, the hospital will refer the patient to a designated hospital for isolation treatment and pathogenic testing.

(2) Designated hospitals and fever clinics

The list of designated hospitals and fever clinics can be found on the official websites of provincial and municipal health care commissions, or you can check the nearby fever clinics and medical treatment designated hospitals under the "fever clinics" section on the home page of the State Council client (Figure 2).


(3) The principles of medical treatment for patients with other diseases during the epidemic

In principle, during an epidemic, people should go to hospitals as little as possible or not at all unless they must seek immediate medical attention for patients with acute and critical illnesses; if they must seek medical attention, they should choose a medical institution nearby that can meet the demand and has a low outpatient volume; if they must go to a hospital, they can have only necessary and urgent medical tests and medical operations done, and other items and operations should be made up at a later date if possible; if they can choose the department to visit, they should avoid If possible, avoid fever clinics, emergency departments, etc.

There are three conditions that must be immediately sought: first, the emergence of medical emergencies, such as the elderly or people with underlying diseases suddenly appear panic, dizziness, chest tightness, etc., must immediately seek medical attention; second, surgical emergencies, such as the emergence of severe pancreatitis, intestinal perforation or appendicitis and other acute abdominal diseases, must immediately go to the hospital; third, children with fever, if children have a fever of more than 39 ℃, bad spirit, and poor appetite, go to the hospital, lest the disease develop into a serious one.

For tumor patients, different types of tumor patients have different medical consultations: ① Routine review patients: for patients with routine review of malignant tumors, it is recommended to slightly delay the review without affecting the prognosis of the disease; the review advocates network consultation and suggests that patients can postpone the review if they have no special discomfort and try to avoid hospitalization for review. ②Patients with elective surgery: patients with benign tumors and patients in remission of malignant tumors after comprehensive treatment are recommended to moderately defer surgical treatment; for patients with progressive malignant tumors, surgical treatment should be carried out under risk-controllable conditions after comprehensive and detailed assessment of patients' physical status and surgical risks. ③Patients in chemotherapy period: For patients who are old and frail and have poor immune status with repeated chemotherapy, the dose of chemotherapy drugs can be moderately reduced or the chemotherapy cycle can be extended without significantly affecting the efficacy. For patients with postoperative adjuvant chemotherapy, it is recommended that chemotherapy can be performed at the local hospital or the outpatient clinic of the original hospital as scheduled, and that chemotherapy can be moderately delayed under the premise that good communication with the physician has little impact on the prognosis of the tumor. Patients with radiotherapy: It is recommended to continue treatment in an orderly manner according to the overall arrangement of the hospital, and synchronous chemotherapy can be moderately delayed. For patients who are ready to start radiotherapy, under the premise of not affecting the prognosis of the tumor, radiotherapy should be moderately delayed according to the arrangement of the doctor in charge. ⑤ Immunotherapy patients: Immunotherapy is still possible after rigorous evaluation. If adverse reactions occur, the medical team should be informed as soon as possible, please do not cope with the occurrence of adverse reactions alone.

 (4) Patients with severe headache or even epileptic seizure must go to hospital; (5) Increasing eating disorder is a manifestation of tumor progression and must go to hospital for treatment; (6) Severe vomiting and diarrhea, no matter what the cause is, will lead to dehydration and endanger life, so it is necessary to go to hospital immediately to find out the cause and give corresponding symptomatic treatment; (7) Sudden appearance of urinary and fecal dysfunction requires immediate medical attention. It is necessary to go to the hospital immediately to find the cause; ⑧ other serious symptoms.

Patients with stable chronic diseases should strengthen self-management, treat and manage existing chronic diseases as required. Prepare all medications, take them on time, closely observe the change of symptoms and progress of the chronic disease they have, and strengthen the contact with the doctor. Patients with hypertension should have their blood pressure measured daily. If one of the critical conditions occurs, such as systolic blood pressure ≥ 180 mmHg and/or diastolic blood pressure ≥ 110 mmHg; change in consciousness, severe headache or dizziness, nausea and vomiting, blurred vision, eye pain, palpitations, chest tightness, etc., please contact your doctor or go to the hospital promptly. Patients with diabetes should self-monitor their blood glucose and blood pressure. If you have blood glucose ≥ 16.7 mmol/L or blood sugar ≤ 3.9 mmol/L; systolic blood pressure ≥ 180 mmHg and/or diastolic blood pressure ≥ 110 mmHg; change in consciousness or behavior, or other sudden abnormal conditions, such as a sudden and abrupt decrease in vision, please contact your doctor or go to the hospital promptly.

When going to the hospital, you should learn as much as possible about the proposed medical institution in advance through the Internet or by phone, make appointments and preparations, and familiarize yourself with the hospital department layout and step-by-step procedures to reduce the consultation time. Patients and accompanying family members should wear a medical surgical mask or N95 mask throughout the journey to the hospital and in the hospital. If possible, avoid taking public transportation to the hospital. Maintain hand hygiene at all times and have a portable alcohol-based hand sanitizer available. Keep as much distance as possible between people (at least 1 meter) while on the road and in the hospital. If transportation is contaminated while on the road, it is recommended that all surfaces contaminated with respiratory secretions or body fluids be disinfected with a chlorinated disinfectant or peracetic acid disinfectant. Avoid touching your mouth, nose and eyes with your hands as much as possible. When sneezing or coughing, cover your mouth and nose with a tissue or elbow. Try to use hand disinfectant after touching hospital items such as hospital door handles, curtains, doctors' white coats, etc. If you cannot disinfect your hands in time, do not touch your mouth, nose or eyes with your hands. During hospital visits, reduce the length of stay in the hospital as much as possible.

After returning home from the hospital, change your clothes immediately, wash your hands carefully with running water, wash your clothes as soon as possible, and treat them with 84 disinfectant first if possible. If suspicious symptoms (including fever, cough, sore throat, chest tightness, dyspnea, malaise, nausea and vomiting, diarrhea, conjunctivitis, muscle aches, etc.) appear, seek prompt medical attention according to your condition and inform the receiving physician of your activity history for the past 2 weeks.




Home isolation is the main non-pharmaceutical intervention and low-cost measure to contain an epidemic, and personal protective measures such as self-isolation are one of the effective measures to control the epidemic of infectious diseases. As the epidemic progresses, specific isolation measures do not vary from place to place, and home isolation should be carried out according to the specific requirements of each place. Also, according to the changing dynamics of the epidemic outside the country, people returning from abroad should

During home isolation, the role of community health centers and hospitals should be utilized. Isolated persons can seek advice and assistance from community doctors at home by phone or WeChat. Community doctors can also understand and observe the health status of isolated persons through telephone and WeChat video, and provide follow-up guidance. If the person is not available for isolation and observation at home or in the hospital, he or she can go to the local centralized isolation site for isolation.

(1) Individuals with suspected symptoms

Individuals with suspected symptoms should first isolate themselves and seek medical attention at the nearest fever clinic as soon as possible, for details, please refer to "(1) Suspected symptoms in yourself or your family" in "2.

(2) Close contacts and suspected exposed persons

Close contacts and suspected exposures are subject to isolation for medical observation.

Close contacts are anyone who has had close contact with the source of infection (patients with novel coronavirus pneumonia and carriers of the pathogen) and may have been infected. This includes the following.

(1) Living, studying and working together with the patient as colleagues in the same office or classmates in the same classroom or dormitory.
(2) Health care workers who treat and care for the patient, relatives and friends who visit the patient, or other persons who have had close contact with the patient.
(3) The patient travels on the same transport with close contact, including fellow passengers (family members, colleagues and friends, etc.) who have cared for the patient on the transport, as well as other passengers and crew members who, after investigation and assessment, are considered likely to have close contact with the patient.
(4) Field investigators investigated and assessed to be in line with other persons in contact with close contacts.
Suspected exposed persons are those who are exposed to wildlife that tests positive for novel coronavirus and its contaminated articles and environment, and who are not effectively protected at the time of exposure, such as processing, selling, handling, distribution or management.

Self-isolation methods are as follows.

1) Place the isolated person in a well-ventilated, separate room. If a separate room is not available, the caregiver should also maintain a distance of at least 1 meter from close contacts.
(2) Family members should wear masks when entering the isolated person's activity space. Deny visits from people inside or outside the family.
3) Limit the range of movement of isolated persons and ensure that shared areas (toilets and bathrooms, etc.) are well ventilated.
4) Do not spit, and cover your mouth and nose with a tissue or elbow sleeve when coughing or sneezing.
5) Wash your hands regularly. When washing hands with soap and water, it is best to use disposable hand wipes. Minimize and avoid contact with supplies used by close contacts (cell phones, remote controls, utensils and towels, etc.), disinfect public supplies (tables, chairs and door handles, etc.), and recommend the use of chlorinated disinfectants and peroxyacetic acid disinfectants.
6) Wear good disposable gloves and masks to clean and disinfect the home environment, wet mop the floor with chlorinated disinfectant daily, and seal and dispose of garbage properly. Keep the home environment clean.

Subjects under observation should seek immediate medical attention as soon as they develop symptoms, especially of acute respiratory infections, including fever, cough, sore throat, and difficulty breathing or diarrhea, as recommended below.

1) Isolated persons should wear a mask and keep more than 1 meter away from other people once they develop symptoms (this should be done for both transportation or medical facilities).
(2) Public transportation should be avoided as much as possible, you can call 120 or drive to the hospital, pay attention to open the car windows to keep ventilation, and disinfect the private car as required when needed.
(3) All personnel who come into contact with the sick person and medical personnel should wash their hands promptly.
4) Any part of the vehicle contaminated by respiratory secretions or body fluids should be disinfected promptly (1 part bleach + 99 parts water).

The observed subjects can resume normal school, work and life after the observation period of 14 days from the last unprotected exposure or suspected exposure to the case, and those who have not developed the disease can resume normal school, work and life.

Both close contacts and suspected exposures should stop self-isolating at home and seek prompt medical attention as soon as one of the following occurs.
1) The presence of dyspnea (including chest tightness, breath-holding, and shortness of breath that worsens with activity).
2) Problems with consciousness (including drowsiness, talking nonsense, confusion between day and night, etc.)
3) Diarrhea.
4) High fever over 39°C.
5) Other family members showing suspicious symptoms of new coronavirus infection.




(1) Please refer to the latest version of the recommended protocol for the treatment of "novel coronavirus pneumonia" at Peking Union Medical College Hospital.

(2) See the latest version of the National Health Commission's "Novel Coronavirus Pneumonia Treatment Protocol".





Universal precautions can be summarized in fifteen words: "wear a mask, wash your hands frequently, cover your nose and mouth, gather less, and exercise more".

(A) Wearing a mask

Wearing a mask is one of the most important means of preventing respiratory infections such as novel coronavirus pneumonia.

What kind of masks work?

Do not choose: paper masks, cotton masks, sponge masks, activated charcoal masks.
You can choose: medical surgical masks, N95 masks (Figure 3).


When to wear a mask?

When you go out and have contact with others, you should wear a mask. Especially when you go to the hospital, take public transportation, or stay in a relatively confined or crowded space for a long time, you should wear a mask reasonably.


How to choose a mask?

General population: the general public, public transportation drivers, cab drivers, sanitation workers, public place service personnel and other on-duty period is recommended to use medical surgical masks, conditional and physical condition allows the conditions, can wear KN95/N95 and above particulate protection masks.

Special populations:People at high risk of exposure to suspected or confirmed cases are recommended in principle to wear medical protective masks and goggles. Patients with certain cardiopulmonary diseases should consult with a medical professional before wearing and choose a suitable mask under the guidance of a medical professional.

What is a medical surgical mask?

First look at the product identification on the outer packaging, product performance needs to comply with YY 0469 a 2011. the outer packaging clearly indicates the medical surgical mask. Medical surgical masks are divided into 3 layers, the outer layer has a water-blocking effect, which prevents droplets from entering the mask to the inside; the middle layer has a filtering effect, and the bacterial filtration efficiency of the mask should be not less than 95%; the inner layer near the mouth and nose is used to absorb moisture (Figure 4).


How do I wear a mask?

Wearing steps (Figure 5): ①Before wearing the medical surgical mask, you should check whether it is within the expiration date. ②Nose clip side facing up, dark side facing out (or fold facing down). ③Pull the folds up and down so that the mask covers the mouth, nose and jaw. ④Touch the fingertips of both hands along the metal strip of the nasal bridge, from the middle to the sides, and slowly press inward until it is tight against the bridge of the nose. ⑤ Adjust the mask appropriately so that the perimeter of the mask fits the face adequately.


Steps for wearing a medical protective mask (Figure 6).
1) Check the expiration date of the mask and the outer packaging.
(2) Hold the mask fastened to the face with the convex side facing outward and the nose clip side facing upward.
3) First set the lower lacing, then set the upper lacing.
4) Touch the fingertips of both hands inward to press the nasal clip and gradually move outward to shape the clip.
(5) Adjust the nose clip and lacing until no air leakage when blowing and inhaling.
(6) contamination, damage and exceed the time limit of use instructions to replace, hold the ties and discarded in the medical (yellow) garbage can.



How do special people wear masks?

(1) Pregnant women wearing protective masks should pay attention to their own conditions and choose products with better comfort.
(2) The elderly and patients with chronic heart and lung diseases will cause discomfort after wearing, and may even aggravate the original condition, should seek professional guidance from a doctor.
(3) Children are in the growth and development stage, their faces are small, so they should choose children's protective masks.


How often should I change my mask?

If the mask is wet or soiled by secretions and the protective performance is reduced, it is recommended to replace it immediately. The public wears masks and does not have to use them once for a change, but can decide whether to use them for a longer period of time depending on the degree of cleanliness.

How to dispose of the mask after use?

After wearing, the mask should be removed in the correct way (Figure 7). Reuse of disposable masks is not recommended. If repeatedly used several times, in addition to the possible decrease in the protective effect of the mask, the dust, bacteria and viruses accumulated on the outer layer of the mask may contaminate the inner surface and cause infection. If the mask is used within the time limit and must be reused due to some special circumstances, do not directly take off the mask and stuff it in your pocket or bag, it should be folded (the side in contact with the nose and mouth should be folded inward) in a clean self-sealing bag to avoid contamination of the inside of the mask by the outside. After taking off the mask, you should wash your hands in time.


The masks worn by healthy people have no risk of transmission of the new coronavirus and are generally replaced when they are deformed, wet or soiled resulting in reduced protective performance. The masks used by the healthy population can be disposed of according to the requirements of household waste classification.

The masks worn by suspected cases or confirmed patients should not be discarded at will, and should be treated as medical waste and handled in strict accordance with the relevant procedures for medical waste, and should not enter the circulation market.

In addition, masks should never be washed with water or alcohol and then reused. Cutting and shredding is not recommended for handling, as droplets may contaminate the scissors. Do not use boiling water to scald the mask either, the operation process will instead increase the risk of viral infection.

How to avoid skin damage when wearing a mask for a long time?

First of all, we should choose the right size mask, avoid using shoddy products, children should choose the right size, and apply some emollient lotion behind the ears of the face when wearing; secondly, we can change the position of the mask or take it off after wearing for a period of time to let the skin reduce pressure, and find that redness and damage should let the skin fully rest and be treated accordingly; finally, we can apply emollient lotion and dressing to reduce skin damage in the pressure area.

(B) frequent hand washing, hand disinfection when necessary


It is essential to wash your hands regularly and in the right way as it can effectively cut off the transmission of the virus.

You should wash your hands promptly after coughing and sneezing, before and after touching outsiders or caring for patients, before and after preparing food, before eating, after going to the bathroom, after touching animals, after handling garbage, after outdoor sports, homework, shopping, and after touching money. If the dirt on your hands is not visible, use a no-rinse hand sanitizer that contains alcohol. Reduce contact with common objects and parts of public places; try to avoid touching your mouth, nose and eyes with your hands when you are not sure if your hands are thoroughly clean.

Hand washing must be done with running water, not basin water, and rubbing time should be at least 20 seconds. You can't just wash your hands with water, you have to use soap or hand sanitizer to effectively remove pathogenic bacteria. If soap is used, the soap should be kept clean and dry. It is best to use hand sanitizer in disposable packages, such as using replacement packs, and to clean and disinfect the container before each dispense; when the soap is cloudy or discolored, it should be replaced. If you use alcohol-based hand sanitizer, please pay attention to the expiration date of "use after opening" in the product description, generally not more than 30 days after opening the bottle; do not "rub" dry on your clothes after washing your hands, prepare dry hand towels or dryers in advance.

Hand washing steps should be done correctly (Figure 8).
1) Wet your hands under running water.
2) Take an appropriate amount of hand sanitizer (soap) and apply it evenly to the entire palm, back of the hand, fingers and fingertips.
(3) carefully rub hands for at least 15 seconds, as follows: a. palms relative to each other, fingers together, rubbing each other; b. palms and hands along the back of the fingers rubbing each other, exchange; c. palms relative to each other, hands cross fingers rubbing each other; d. bend fingers so that the knuckles in the other hand palm rotating rubbing, exchange; e. right hand holding the left thumb rotating rubbing, exchange; f. will be five finger tips together in the palm of the other hand, rotating and rubbing, and exchanging.
4) Rinse hands thoroughly under running water.
5) Dry your hands and take an appropriate amount of hand lotion for skin care.


(C) diligent ventilation, maintain a clean living and working environment


Diligently open windows, more ventilation, ventilation 2 to 3 times a day, no less than 30 minutes each time, need to pay attention to the temperature difference between indoor and outdoor and cause colds and the adaptation of the population. Families with conditions can also use circulating air disinfection machines, which are recommended to be used with windows and doors closed. Air conditioning filters and filters should be cleaned and disinfected monthly. The disinfection method can be used with an effective chlorine content of 250mg/L chlorine disinfection solution sprayed until wet, the role of 30 minutes. The cleaning and disinfection methods for different environments can be referred to the relevant contents of the third, fourth, fifth and sixth parts of this chapter.



(1) Reduce unnecessary going out, especially during the Spring Festival, you should visit friends and relatives and gather less, cancel the plan of going out for travel and visiting relatives, and try to rest at home; avoid going to closed, airless public places and crowded places, such as: shopping malls, stations, theaters, Internet cafes, exhibition halls, etc.

(2) Please wear a mask when you go out. Please refer to "(1) Wearing a mask" in "I. General precautions" in this chapter.

(3) Wash your hands regularly. Hand washing can be found in "(2) Washing hands regularly" in this chapter "I. General preventive measures".

(4) diligent ventilation. For details, please refer to "(3) diligent ventilation" in "I. General preventive measures" of this chapter.

(5) When coughing or sneezing, cover your mouth and nose with tissues or clothing (Figure 9) and do not spit.


(6) Reduce sharing items with others, including toothbrushes, tableware, meals, drinks, towels, bath towels, bed sheets, etc. Regularly disinfect dishes, furniture, floors, etc., and dry clothes and blankets regularly.

(7) Do not touch, buy and eat wild animals (i.e., game); avoid markets that sell live animals (poultry, wildlife, etc.).

(8) Keep supplies at home such as thermometers, medical surgical masks or N95 masks, and household disinfection supplies.

(9) During the leave, eat lightly, pay attention to nutrition and exercise properly.

(10) If you have suspected symptoms such as fever, malaise, cough, sore throat, chest tightness, dyspnea, weakness, or diarrhea, go to the fever clinic of the nearest medical institution. Medical attention can be found in Chapter 2, "Symptoms, medical care, isolation and treatment", "2.
You can refer to the following table for the level of personal protection.



(1) Home environment

Ordinary families should have good ventilation indoors during disease epidemics, natural ventilation or mechanical ventilation. When opening windows in winter, attention needs to be paid to colds caused by large temperature differences between indoors and outdoors. After coming home, you should wash your hands with hand sanitizer and running water, or disinfect your hands with effective disinfectants such as iodophor, chlorine disinfectant and hydrogen peroxide disinfectant.


The floor, desktop, furniture and other object surfaces are cleaned well every day and disinfected regularly. A concentration of 250mg/L chlorine-containing disinfectant can be prepared for wiping; metal, electrical appliances and other non-corrosive resistant object surfaces are wiped with 75% alcohol; the disinfection action time should be no less than 15 minutes, and then wiped with water to remove residual disinfectant. Water cups, tableware and other utensils can be disinfected by boiling or circulating steam for 15 minutes after washing; or refer to the instructions to use the disinfection cupboard for disinfection. Cleaning tools can be disinfected by soaking in chlorine disinfectant with an effective chlorine content of 500mg/L for 30 minutes and then washing and drying. After a guest (health status unknown) visits, disinfect the relevant object surfaces in the room in a timely manner. Personal protection should be provided during disinfection by wearing latex or nitrile gloves, waterproof aprons (or sleeved raincoats instead), masks, etc., and washing hands promptly after disinfection. Confirm the expiration date and dilution ratio of the disinfectant, and mix it well.

When a family member shows suspicious symptoms, other family members should be isolated and sent to the doctor in a timely manner (see "2. Seeking medical attention" in "Chapter 2: Symptoms, medical attention, isolation, and treatment"). After consultation, disinfect the isolated room and contact items (e.g., living room floor, bathroom, furniture countertops, door handles, eating utensils, etc.).

When a patient with novel coronavirus infection is present in the home, final disinfection should be performed after the patient leaves (e.g., hospitalization, death, release from isolation, etc.). The final disinfection of the patient's home includes the floor and walls of the living room, tables, chairs and other furniture countertops, door handles, the patient's dining utensils, clothes, bedding and other household items, toys, bathrooms including toilets, etc. Terminal disinfection is usually done by professionals and carried out by the local Center for Disease Control and Prevention. Other family members are close contacts and should be under medical observation for 14 days.


(2) Private cars

Under daily circumstances, private cars do not need to disinfection treatment, in open places, do a good job of ventilation. When opening the windows in winter, you need to pay attention to the temperature difference between inside and outside the car, do not cause a cold. In the underground parking lot and other confined environment, it is recommended to close the windows, open the air conditioning internal circulation way to ventilation.

After entering a public place and returning to the vehicle, drivers and passengers are advised to use hand sanitizer for hand hygiene first. After having friends and relatives (health status unknown) aboard, promptly open the windows for ventilation and disinfect the relevant object surfaces in the vehicle by choosing a legal and effective disinfectant or disinfectant wipes for disinfection. Object surfaces can be disinfected with chlorine disinfectant, chlorine dioxide, etc. or disinfectant wipes. Hands and skin are recommended to choose effective disinfectants such as iodophor, chlorinated disinfectants and hydrogen peroxide disinfectants for hand and skin disinfection or quick-drying hand disinfectants for wiping and disinfection.

Those with suspicious symptoms (suspicious symptoms include fever, cough, sore throat, chest tightness, dyspnea, fatigue, nausea and vomiting, diarrhea, conjunctivitis, muscle aches, etc.) should wear a medical surgical mask when riding in a private car, try to keep a distance from people in the same car, do not turn on the air conditioning internal circulation, and open the windows moderately for ventilation. After a person with suspicious symptoms gets out of the car, quickly open the windows for ventilation and disinfect the surfaces of the objects they touch (door handles, steering wheels, windows, windshields, seats, etc.).

The final disinfection of the private car should be done promptly after the patient gets out of the car after riding in the private car with novel coronavirus infection. The scope of final disinfection for private cars includes object surfaces (seats, steering wheels, windows, door handles, etc.), air conditioning systems, and vomit. Chlorine dioxide is the recommended disinfectant of choice, and the car should be started and the air conditioning internal circulation turned on during disinfection treatment. The specific disinfection method is operated by professionals from local CDC agencies or qualified third parties, and the vehicle is not recommended to be used without disinfection treatment before. Other co-passengers are close contacts and should be under medical observation for 14 days.




Should follow the State Council issued the "pneumonia mechanism issued [2020] No. 5" document requirements.

Work plan on community prevention and control of pneumonia outbreak of novel coronavirus infection (trial)
In order to implement the community-based prevention and control measures, guide the community to carry out the prevention and control of pneumonia outbreak of novel coronavirus infection in a scientific and orderly manner, detect cases early, effectively curb the spread and spread of the epidemic, and reduce the public health hazards caused by novel coronavirus infection, according to the "Prevention and Control of Infectious Diseases Law of the People's Republic of China", "Basic Medical Hygiene and Health Promotion Law of the People's Republic of China", "Emergency Public Health Emergency Regulations", "Emergency Plan for Public Health Emergencies", "Pneumonia Case Surveillance Program for Novel Coronavirus Infection" and other relevant documents, this work plan is formulated.
I. Work requirements
(a) Party and government-led, community mobilization, the implementation of grid-based, carpet management, the prevention and control measures to the letter.
(B) the implementation of the "early detection, early reporting, early isolation, early diagnosis, early treatment" principle, and do a good job in the community new coronavirus infection pneumonia outbreak detection, prevention and control and emergency response work.
II. Relevant definitions
(i) Community
Community" in this program refers to urban and rural communities (i.e. urban communities and villages) under the jurisdiction of street offices or township people's governments.
(B) community outbreak division
1. No cases were found in the community. It means that no confirmed cases of pneumonia with novel coronavirus infection were found among the community residents.
2. There are cases or outbreaks in the community.
A case in the community is defined as the presence of one confirmed case of pneumonia with novel coronavirus infection in a community population that has not yet had a sequel case.
An outbreak is defined as the discovery of 2 or more confirmed cases in a small area (e.g., a household, a construction site, the same unit in a building, etc.) within 14 days, with the possibility of interpersonal transmission between cases due to close contact or the possibility of infection due to co-exposure.
3. Community transmission outbreak. In the community, there are two or more cases of infection of unknown origin within 14 days, or outbreaks of a large number and size, with a continuous trend of transmission.
(C) the epidemic point, the division of the epidemic area
1. Epidemic site
In the event of a case or outbreak in the community, the area where the case may have contaminated is identified as an outbreak site. In principle, places visited by the patient 3 days before the onset of the disease until the isolation and treatment, places where the patient stays for more than 1 hour and where the space is small and poorly ventilated should be classified as an outbreak site for management. An outbreak site is generally defined as one or several households, one or several offices, train or bus cars, the same flight, the same ward, the same building, etc.
2. Infected areas
If there is a community-transmitted outbreak, the community may be identified as an infected area according to the relevant provisions of the Law of the People's Republic of China on the Prevention and Control of Infectious Diseases.
(iv) close contacts
With the case after the onset of one of the following exposure scenarios, but did not take effective protection.
1. people who live, study, work with the case, or otherwise have close contact, such as working in close proximity to the case or sharing the same classroom or living in the same house as the case.
2. medical staff, family members or other persons who have similar close contact with the case, such as direct treatment and care of the case, visiting the patient or staying in the confined environment where the case is located, other patients and their companions in the same ward of the case.
3. travel on the same means of transport as the case and have close contact with personnel, including those who have cared for the patient on the transport, the patient's fellow passengers (family members, colleagues, friends, etc.), and other passengers and crew members found to be in close contact with the patient after investigation and assessment.
4. The site investigator investigates and then evaluates the personnel who are deemed to be in contact with other close contacts.
Third, community prevention and control strategies and measures
(i) No cases found in the community
Implementing the strategy of "external prevention and importation", specific measures include organizational mobilization, health education, information, management of returnees from infected areas, environmental health management, and material preparation.
1.Organizational mobilization
Communities should establish an organizational system for the prevention and control of pneumonia outbreaks of new coronavirus infections, with street (township) and community (village) cadres, community health service centers and family doctors as the main focus, and encourage the participation of residents and volunteers to form a combination of full-time and part-time work teams, implement grid-based, carpet management, responsibility for the implementation of full coverage of the community (village), building (natural village), family, and the implementation of prevention and control Measures.
2. Health education
Make full use of a variety of means to carry out targeted pneumonia prevention and control knowledge of new coronavirus infection, actively advocate hygiene, eliminate bad habits, abandon littering, spitting and other uncivilized behavior, to create "everyone is the first person responsible for their own health" "my health I am in charge "The good atmosphere. Make the public fully understand the health knowledge, grasp the key points of protection, develop hand hygiene, more ventilation, keep clean good habits, reduce travel, avoid attending rallies, parties, take public transportation or go to crowded places to do a good job of protection, wear a mask, avoid contact with animals (especially wild animals), birds or their droppings.
3．Information
Disseminate information to the public about medical consultation; those with respiratory symptoms without fever go to community health protection centers (township health centers), those with fever go to fever clinics, and those with novel coronavirus infections go to sentinel hospitals. Daily information on local and local community outbreaks is released to suggest travel and travel risks.
4. Management of returnees from infected areas
Communities should issue notices requiring that people returning from infected areas should immediately register at their village branch or community and go to the local health center or village doctor or community health service center for medical checkups twice a day, while taking the initiative to self-isolate for 14 days. All those returning from infected areas with febrile respiratory symptoms should promptly seek medical clearance nearby and be isolated at home or at a government-designated location or hospital as required; their close contacts should also immediately self-isolate at home or at a locally designated location. During the isolation period, please keep in touch with local medical personnel or the CDC for follow-up observation.
5. Environmental health management
The community carries out comprehensive vector-biological prevention and control, mainly environmental remediation, supplemented by drug disinfection, and carries out sanitary cleaning of key places such as residential neighborhoods, garbage transfer stations and construction sites, disposes of garbage and dirt, and eliminates the breeding environment for rodents, cockroaches, mosquitoes, flies and other vector-biological organisms. Timely organization of comprehensive vector control and extermination to effectively reduce the density of vector organisms.
6. Material preparation
Communities and families stock up on essential prevention and control items and supplies, such as thermometers, masks, disinfection supplies, etc.
(ii) The emergence of cases or outbreaks in the community
The strategy of "internal prevention of spread and external prevention of export" includes the six measures mentioned above, as well as close contact management and disinfection.
7. Close contact management
Give full play to the role of community preventive health doctors, family contracted doctors, community cadres and other grid managers to conduct screening and implement home or centralized medical observation of close contacts of confirmed cases of pneumonia with novel coronavirus infection, and centralized observation sites should be clearly defined where available. Daily follow-up visits to the health status of close contacts, instructing the observation subjects to monitor changes in their own situation more sensitively and keep records. Make preparations for isolation control and transfer of patients to designated hospitals, etc.
8. Disinfection
The community should assist the CDC to disinfect the case homes, building units, unit offices, conference rooms and other epidemic points, as well as clean and disinfected public places.
(iii) Community-transmitted epidemics
The strategy of "internal prevention of spread and external prevention of export" includes the 8 measures mentioned above, as well as the 2 measures of blocking the infected area and restricting the gathering of people.
9. Blockade of infected areas: Communities classified as infected areas may take measures to blockade the infected areas if necessary, restrict the access of people, and temporarily requisition houses and transportation.
10. Restrict the gathering of people: Restrict or stop activities such as fairs, rallies and other gatherings of people in the community, and close public baths, spas, theaters, Internet cafes, KTVs, shopping malls and other public places. If necessary, suspend work, business and classes.




(1) Public places with heavy flow of people and high mobility

Suitable for shopping malls, restaurants, cinemas, KTV, Internet cafes, public baths, gymnasiums, exhibition halls, railway stations, subway stations, airports, bus stations and other public places.

Staff in public places should monitor their own health and not go to work with illness if they have suspicious symptoms of novel coronavirus infection (such as fever, cough, sore throat, chest tightness, difficulty in breathing, mild nausea, weakness, slightly poor spirit, nausea and vomiting, diarrhea, headache, heartburn, conjunctivitis, mild muscle pain in the limbs or lower back, etc.). If suspicious symptoms of novel coronavirus infection are detected, staff should ask them to leave or contact the hospital promptly.

Public use items and public contact items or parts should be cleaned and disinfected regularly.

Maintain air circulation in public places. Ensure that the air conditioning system or exhaust fan is functioning properly, clean the air conditioning filter regularly, and strengthen the ventilation of open windows.

Washrooms should be equipped with sufficient hand sanitizer to ensure that water supply facilities such as faucets are working properly. Disinfect sanitary facilities in a timely manner and use air disinfection spray to disinfect the air when necessary.

Keep the environment clean and clear the garbage in time.

In areas where the disease is endemic, the public should minimize visits to public places, especially avoiding places with heavy traffic and poor air circulation.

(2) Workplace

Commuting to and from work

Wear disposable medical masks correctly. Try not to take public transportation, it is recommended to walk, ride or take private cars or shuttles to and from work. If you have to take public transportation, public trams are preferred. Be sure to wear a mask throughout the journey. Avoid touching objects in the car with your hands during the journey. When you leave work, wash your hands and wear a disposable medical mask, and when you return home, wash your hands after removing the mask. Use disinfectant wipes or 75% alcohol to wipe your cell phone and keys. Keep your home ventilated and hygienically clean, and avoid multi-person gatherings.

Disinfection of public areas and air conditioners

Public areas such as foyers, hallways, conference rooms, elevators, stairs, and restrooms must be disinfected daily, using spray disinfection whenever possible. The cleaning utensils used in each area should be separated to avoid mixing. In addition to daily routine cleaning and disinfection, bathrooms should be disinfected regularly and air disinfection should be carried out by spray.

Central air conditioning system fan coils in normal use, regular disinfection of the air supply and return air outlets. If there is an epidemic, do not stop the fan operation, should be closed after the evacuation of personnel, the exhaust branch, run for a period of time to shut down the fresh air exhaust system, while disinfection. All-air system with return air should be completely closed the return air to ensure that the system runs with all fresh air.

During the epidemic prevention period, do hand hygiene before and after taking off masks, put discarded masks in the garbage cans, and disinfect the garbage cans twice a day with 75% alcohol or chlorine-containing disinfectant.

Entry work and elevator ride

Before entering the office building, you should take a temperature test and go to the bathroom to wash your hands. If your body temperature exceeds 37.2℃, please do not enter the building to work, and go home to observe and rest, or go to the hospital if necessary.

The frequency of elevator rides should be reduced, and passengers on low floors can take the stairs on foot. Carry toilet paper (gloves) with you, and press the elevator button through the toilet paper (gloves). Dispose of the toilet paper (gloves) properly after use. Stand on both sides of the hall door while waiting for the elevator, do not get too close to the hall door, and do not touch the passengers coming out of the elevator car face to face. After the passenger comes out of the car, press the button outside the elevator hall to prevent the elevator from closing and wait for a moment before entering the elevator. Avoid riding in the elevator with more than one stranger. Passengers who have enough time can wait patiently for the next elevator. Try not to use the elevator to carry things and reduce the contact between your belongings and the elevator car. Wash and disinfect your hands promptly after riding in the elevator.

Elevator units should pay attention to the health of passengers, feverish people have a need to take the elevator (such as hospitals), and conditions allow, can be set up independently a special elevator for feverish people, and strengthen the maintenance and control of the elevator. For elevators with ventilation fans installed in the cabin, the ventilation fans should be kept open for a long time. For elevators without ventilation fans installed in the cabin, the cabin doors can be opened regularly for ventilation in combination with disinfection work. Each ventilation time should be at least 10 minutes. During a pneumonia epidemic, local disinfection (such as elevator key panels) and full disinfection can be alternated. If a confirmed or suspected case is found to have ridden in an elevator, the elevator operation should be stopped immediately and disposed of in accordance with the requirements of the health prevention department.

Elevator disinfection work should be carried out by trained personnel with certain knowledge of disinfection, and accompanied by elevator maintenance personnel. Personnel should wear work clothes, gloves, work shoes, masks, hats, goggles, etc. when necessary. And prepare disinfection medicine and items, clean rags, spray cans, warning signs, mops, etc. Before starting disinfection, the elevator should first be stopped and warning signs set. Clean the elevator thoroughly and then disinfect it. If ultraviolet light is used for disinfection, the car door should be closed and the car should be irradiated by ultraviolet light for not less than half an hour. If disinfectant is used, a clean rag can be dipped into the disinfectant and wiped on the button panel, handrail and other parts frequently touched by passengers. Other parts such as hall door and car wall can be sprayed and coated with a small amount of spraying bottle. After disinfection for a specified period of time, wring out the wet rag and wipe the key panel and other parts to avoid corrosion of the elevator electronic components by the disinfectant. Other parts can be removed with a wet rag to avoid residual disinfectant damage to human body. After disinfection is completed, resume normal operation of the elevator, retrieve the warning sign, bring back the tools and make records of the elevator cleaning and disinfection. Staff take off protective equipment and bring it back in bags for disposal and personnel for sanitary disposal.

Inside the office

Keep the office area clean, it is recommended to ventilate 3 times a day for 20-30 minutes each time, and pay attention to keeping warm when ventilating. Maintain a distance of more than 1 meter between people, and wear a mask when working with multiple people and entering the bathroom. Maintain diligent hand washing, drink more water, and insist on strict hand washing before eating and after toileting in accordance with the six-step method.

Daily disinfection of shared items in the office, especially common contact areas, e.g., kettles, phones, printers, etc. Disinfecting wipes or 75% alcohol wipes can be used. This can be increased to four times if used frequently. When working in the office, wash hands before and after passing paper documents, and wear a mask when passing documents.

Participation in conferences and official visits

Use telephone and video conferencing as much as possible to reduce centralized meetings. During face-to-face meetings, control the length of the meeting and recommend that all participants wear masks and wash their hands to disinfect before entering the meeting room. Separate meeting participants by more than 1 meter. When the meeting is too long, open the window for ventilation once. After the meeting, the venue and furniture must be disinfected. It is recommended to disinfect teaware by soaking in boiling water.

Visitors are required to wear a mask. Before entering the office building, first conduct a temperature test, and introduce any history of Lakeland exposure and symptoms such as fever, cough and breathlessness. No such conditions and normal body temperature conditions, before entering the building for public work. Receive outsiders on both sides to wear masks.

Canteen meals

Adopt staggered meals. It is recommended that employees who are in a position to do so bring their own lunch boxes and bring them back to the office for meals after purchase to avoid crowding. The restaurant is disinfected once a day, and tables and chairs are disinfected after use. Disinfection of tableware is required at high temperature. Keep the operation room clean and dry, strictly prohibit the mixing of raw food and cooked food supplies, and avoid raw meat. It is recommended that nutritious meals be prepared, light and palatable.

Official Travel

Travelers must wear masks to travel and avoid dense crowds. Maintain a distance of more than 1 meter from human contact and avoid prolonged stay in public places.

It is recommended that the interior and door handles of the shuttle bus be wiped with 75% alcohol once a day when traveling. The shuttle bus must wear a mask, and it is recommended that the shuttle bus be wiped with 75% alcohol to disinfect the interior and door handles after use.

Logisticians

Service personnel, security personnel and cleaning personnel must wear masks when working and keep a safe distance from people. Canteen procurement staff or supply staff must wear masks and disposable rubber gloves to avoid direct hand contact with meat and poultry raw materials, and wash hands and disinfect after removing gloves. Cleaning staff must wear disposable rubber gloves when working, and wash their hands after work to disinfect. Security personnel shall wear masks and carefully inquire and register the status of outsiders, and report any abnormalities in a timely manner.

(3) Public transportation

See "Technical Guidelines for Public Transport Disinfection Operations".

Public transport disinfection operation technical guide

I. Scope 
This guideline applies to the prevention and control of infection on public transport such as airplanes, trains, long and short-distance buses, buses, subways and ships in normal operation during the epidemic of pneumonia with novel coronavirus infection, including technical operations such as disinfection taken by staff and travelers on public transport.
Second, the staff operating guidelines
During an epidemic of novel coronavirus infection pneumonia, public transport staff need to carry out the following tasks.
(A) do a good job of object surface disinfection. Under daily circumstances, the environment on public transportation should be kept clean and sanitary, and preventive disinfection measures should be taken; after the operation of public transportation such as airplanes, trains, subways, buses and ships, internal object surfaces (such as the inside of the body, driver's steering wheel, handrails inside the car, tables and chairs, etc.) should be sprayed or wiped with chlorine disinfectant containing 250 to 500 mg/L of effective chlorine, or effective of disinfectant wipes for wiping; seat covers and other textiles should be kept clean and regularly washed and disinfected.
When vomiting occurs on public transportation, disinfectants (such as chlorinated disinfectants) or disinfectant dry towels should be used immediately to cover the vomit and disinfect the surface of the object after removing the vomit, and then use disinfectants such as Neosporin to disinfect the surface of the object.
When there are suspected or confirmed cases, under the guidance of professionals, the contaminants should be completely removed before disinfection when there are visible contaminants; when there are no visible contaminants, 1000mg/L chlorine disinfectant or 500mg/L chlorine dioxide disinfectant can be wiped or sprayed for disinfection. The ground disinfection is sprayed once from the outside to the inside, with a spray volume of 100-300ml/㎡, and then repeatedly sprayed once from the inside to the outside after the indoor disinfection is completed. The disinfection time should be no less than 30 minutes.
(B) strengthen the ventilation and air exchange. Under daily circumstances, natural ventilation or mechanical ventilation can be used. Aircraft, high-speed trains, subways and other relatively confined environments, it is recommended that the appropriate increase in air conditioning for air power to improve the number of air changes, and pay attention to regular cleaning and treatment of air conditioning filters; short-distance buses, buses and other public transport with open windows, when available, windows can be opened at low speed, but also during the stop and open the windows to maintain air circulation.
When there are suspected or confirmed cases, disinfectants such as peroxyacetic acid, chlorine-containing disinfectants, chlorine dioxide and hydrogen peroxide are selected under unmanned conditions under the guidance of professionals, using the ultra-low volume spray method.
(iii) Pay attention to personal protection. Under daily circumstances, it is recommended that staff wear medical surgical masks (or other higher level masks) and gloves; single-use gloves should not be reused, other reused gloves must be cleaned and disinfected daily, either by circulating steam or boiling for 30 minutes, or by first soaking in 500mg/L chlorine-containing disinfectant for 30 minutes, and then routine cleaning is sufficient. When there are suspected or confirmed cases, personal protection is carried out under the guidance of professionals.
(iv) Hand hygiene. Hand hygiene measures should be strengthened and hand hygiene should be performed by staff at all times. Effective alcohol-containing quick-drying hand sanitizers are available. Under special conditions, hand sanitizers containing chlorine or hydrogen peroxide may also be used; hand sanitizers should be used to wash hands under running water when there are contaminants visible to the naked eye, and then disinfected.
(v) Establishment of an emergency area. It is recommended that emergency areas be set up on public transportation, such as the back three rows of seats on airplanes, trains, and buses, where suspected or confirmed cases can be temporarily isolated when they appear.
(vi) Health education. Always pay attention to the prevention and control of health education on public transport.
Three, travelers operating guidelines
(a) Wear masks and gloves. Travelers taking public transportation, it is recommended to wear medical surgical masks (or other higher level masks), and discarded in time at the end of the trip. Travelers who have the option to wear gloves, single-use gloves can not be reused, other reuse gloves need to pay attention to cleaning and disinfection, can circulate steam or boiling disinfection for 30 minutes, or first soak in 500mg / L of chlorine disinfectant for 30 minutes, and then routine cleaning can be.
(ii) Hand hygiene. Pay attention to hand hygiene, travelers should enhance hand hygiene during the trip, and hand hygiene is required after the trip. Effective alcohol-containing quick-drying hand sanitizer can be used, and under special conditions, chlorine-containing or hydrogen peroxide hand sanitizer can also be used; hand sanitizer should be used to wash hands under running water when there are contaminants visible to the naked eye, and then disinfected.
(C) pay attention to maintain distance. Travelers on public transport, when available, try to keep a certain distance between each other.
(iv) Actively cooperate with the staff. In daily situations, listen to the arrangements of public transportation staff and do personal protection. When a suspected or confirmed case appears, listen to the staff's instructions, promptly self-isolate, follow the arrangements for screening and testing, and do not leave privately.



(1) Schools and child care institutions

1) Strengthen the ventilation of the teaching and living environment (e.g. classrooms, music rooms, dance rooms, reading rooms, nursery rooms, dormitories, teaching and research rooms) in schools and childcare institutions to maintain air circulation and clean indoor and outdoor environmental hygiene. Avoid holding school-wide or garden-wide indoor assemblies and other activities.
(2) Implement hand hygiene, set up sufficient hand-washing taps, and equip hand sanitizer or soap for teachers and students to use; childcare institutions are implemented daily by caregivers for children to wash their hands regularly. Promote the correct hand washing technique.
3) To strengthen preventive disinfection, public classroom places (such as music rooms, dance rooms, computer rooms) are recommended for a group of students to go in and disinfect once. Classroom desks, chairs, and other surfaces with high human contact can be disinfected by spraying or wiping with a chlorine-containing disinfectant with an effective chlorine level of 250-500 mg/L for 30 minutes and then washing with water. For objects that are not resistant to corrosion, 75% alcohol or 0.1% benzalkonium bromide (Neosporin) can be used for wiping and disinfection, and safety should be observed when using it. For large areas of floors and walls, chlorine disinfectant with an effective chlorine level of 250-500 mg/L can be sprayed from the inside out, the amount of spraying should be wet and without dripping, and the action time should be not less than 30 minutes.
(4) Carry out various forms of health education in schools and childcare institutions to popularize the knowledge of prevention and control of respiratory infectious diseases. Establish a sound mechanism for contacting schools, parents, students and medical institutions, improve information collection and reporting channels, and ensure the smooth flow of information.
(5) Strengthen health monitoring and material stockpiling. To have a person to implement the morning and afternoon checkups, do a good job of tracking the absence from school due to illness and the registration of the cause of the disease, and report in a timely manner when abnormalities such as an unusual increase in cases of respiratory infectious diseases are detected. Strengthen the stockpile of protective supplies, the school nurse's office to stock a certain number of medical masks, disposable gloves, hand sanitizer and cold medicine.
(6) to carry out various forms of health education and popularize the knowledge of prevention and control of respiratory infectious diseases.
(7) When symptoms such as fever, malaise, dry cough and chest tightness occur, you should immediately wear a mask and seek medical attention in a timely manner to avoid attending classes with illness. When a student or teacher is diagnosed with novel coronavirus infection, his or her close contacts should be placed under medical observation for 14 days. Schools and child care institutions are responsible for home visits to contact students who have left school or school to learn about their daily health status. Implement a daily and zero reporting system according to the requirements of disease prevention and control agencies to keep track of the daily increase or decrease of students with cases. Cooperate with the health and wellness department to handle the epidemic and other tasks.

(2) Nursing homes

During the disease epidemic, it is recommended that the nursing home implement closed management, in principle, do not receive visits from outsiders, the elderly can not leave the hospital to go out, no longer accept new elderly residents, the elderly who must go out should be closely observed after returning to the nursing home.

Daily preventive measures:

(1) Ensure that staff and nursing seniors master personal protective measures, hand hygiene requirements, sanitation and health habits to prevent novel coronavirus pneumonia, avoid sharing personal belongings, pay attention to ventilation, and implement disinfection measures.
2) Establish health records of the elderly and staff, and conduct daily morning checkups and health registration.
(3) Once the staff appear fever, cough, mild nausea, weakness, slightly poor mental, nausea and vomiting, diarrhea, headache, panic, chest tightness, conjunctivitis, mild limb or back muscle pain and other suspicious symptoms of new coronavirus infection, should immediately stop working and go to the hospital for medical examination and investigation, to exclude new coronavirus infection and other infectious diseases before re-entering the workplace.
(4) Establish a registration system for visitors. If visitors have suspicious symptoms of novel coronavirus infection, their visits should be refused. All foreign visitors should wear medical surgical masks. Those with suspicious symptoms should refuse to visit.
(5) ventilation to keep the indoor air fresh. Open the windows for at least 30 minutes every half day; if it is not suitable to open the windows for ventilation, mechanical ventilation equipment should be equipped to ensure that there is no indoor odor; during the epidemic season of respiratory infectious diseases, indoor ventilation should be strengthened, and if necessary, it is appropriate to use circulating air disinfection machines and other air disinfection; regularly clean and disinfect the air conditioning ventilation system. When opening windows in winter, attention should be paid to avoid colds caused by the large difference between indoor and outdoor temperatures.
(6) Restrooms should be equipped with sufficient hand sanitizer, hand towels or hand dryers to ensure that water supply facilities such as faucets work properly. Advocate the elderly to develop the good habit of washing their hands frequently. Hand cream can be placed by the sink to make it easy to apply after washing hands.
7) Ensure that the environment is clean and sanitary. Frequently dry the bedding and clothes of the elderly. Wipe the tables, chairs and surfaces of objects in the activity room with clean water once a day and disinfect them once or twice a week; wipe the floor, window sills, bedside tables and bed fences in the bedroom with clean water once a day; wipe the door handles, faucets, commode handrails and commode tank buttons with clean water once a day and disinfect them once or twice a week.
(8) Prepare isolation rooms for the isolation and treatment of future elderly with suspected symptoms. The elderly with symptoms should be isolated in time to avoid transmission to other elderly. The isolation room should be set in a single room that is not densely populated, well ventilated, with a separate bathroom, and downwind of the nursing home. Use independent air conditioning as much as possible, if you need to use central air conditioning, the new air system should be turned off. The domestic garbage in the isolation area should be collected uniformly and treated as medical waste.

If an elderly person in a nursing home has suspicious symptoms such as fever, cough, mild nausea, weakness, slightly poor mental health, nausea and vomiting, diarrhea, headache, panic, chest tightness, conjunctivitis, mild muscle pain in the limbs or lower back, the nursing home should also take the following measures:

(1) The elderly single room to isolate themselves and avoid close contact with other people.
(2) Assessment of their health status by medical personnel, depending on the condition of the disease sent to medical institutions for medical treatment, should wear a medical surgical mask on the way to medical treatment, and try to avoid taking public transportation.
(3) promptly contact the local community health agency or the CDC for guidance and assistance with related investigations and dispositions. Those who have had close contact with a person with suspected symptoms without effective protection should be registered immediately and placed under medical observation.
4) Suspension of visitation activities.
5) Reduce unnecessary gatherings, dinners and other group activities, and do not arrange centralized meals.
(6) If an elderly person with suspicious symptoms is diagnosed with novel coronavirus pneumonia, his or her close contacts should be placed under medical observation for 14 days. After the patient leaves (e.g., hospitalization, death, etc.), final disinfection of the residence should be performed promptly. The specific disinfection method should be operated or directed by professionals from the local CDC agency or a qualified third party. The residence is not recommended for use without disinfection.

(3) farmers' markets, birds, flowers, insects and fish markets, live poultry (livestock) trading markets

1）Keep the workplace clean and hygienic and air circulation, daily cleaning and disinfection. To clean mainly, disinfection as a supplement. It is recommended that the market operators selling live animals (poultry, seafood, wild animals, etc.) after the close of business each day, to do "three clean and one disinfection" - clear: the stall scales, offal, feces, chicken feathers, scraps, other garbage and other dirt clean; clean. Use water to clean the countertop, ground, drainage ditch and ground around the store; disinfection: mainly disinfect the cleaned countertop, slaughtering tools, cutting board utensils, cages, stall ground; cleaning: rinse the disinfected utensils, countertop, cutting board, etc. with clean water. In addition, it is recommended that the market be cleaned regularly, emptied of any live poultry (livestock) stockpile; thoroughly remove feces, garbage and debris; dredge sewers, and clean the stall floor, walls, and the environment around the store; and thoroughly disinfect after a comprehensive cleaning.
When disinfecting, for the surface of objects with more human contact, use 500mg/L chlorine-containing disinfectant for spraying or wiping disinfection, and then wash with water after 30 minutes of action. For objects that are not resistant to corrosion, 75% alcohol or 0.1% benzalkonium bromide (Neosporin) can be used for wiping and disinfection, and safety should be observed when using it. For large areas of floors and walls, a chlorine disinfectant solution with an effective chlorine level of 500-1000mg/L can be used for spraying, the amount of spraying should be wet and without dripping, and the action time should be not less than 30 minutes.
(2) Garbage and feces should be concentrated for harmless treatment, and garbage transporters and hand-push garbage collection vehicles should be stored and transported in an airtight manner to improve garbage collection, transportation and treatment. Clean garbage daily to reduce the density of flies.
(3) strengthen vector biological control. Install and implement anti-rodent, anti-mosquito and anti-fly facilities for use, improve the farmers' market vector biological control facilities; market ground hard bottom, ditches to be dredged, potholes ground to be filled, wall holes and cracks to be plugged and wiped, sewers and ditches to be sealed, sewer openings to install anti-rodent facilities; processing, sales, storage of directly imported food premises rooms to be equipped with screens, screen doors, wind curtain machines, screen covers, glass cabinets and other anti-fly facilities;. In and around the market to be placed in accordance with the relevant requirements of poisonous rodent house, regularly put poisonous rodent bait to reduce rodent density; regular inspections to remove all types of small containers of stagnant water, check the market flower store stagnant water to reduce the breeding of mosquitoes and insects.
4) Both shopping at the market and market staff need to wear masks, and try to wear medical masks or medical surgical masks. Keep a safe distance of more than 1 meter when interacting with others in the market; stay away from wild animals. Do not touch, buy and eat wild animals and try to avoid stalls selling live poultry, wild animals, etc.





In this outbreak of novel coronavirus pneumonia, many of the most seriously ill patients are middle-aged and elderly. For elderly people with underlying diseases, once infected, they are very prone to critical illness, multi-organ failure and even death, so they should be better protected.

The respiratory tract of the elderly is more sensitive and fragile, and products that are less irritating to the respiratory tract of the elderly should be chosen for disinfection. Preferably, use 75% alcohol wipes or alcohol wipes. You can also use 84 disinfectant or other chlorine-based disinfectants to wipe down furniture and floors. However, if the elderly are allergic to chlorine or suffer from respiratory irritation, they should not use it. In addition, a variety of smoked white wine, vinegar, moxibustion and other "prescriptions" spread on the Internet can not achieve the effect of disinfection, and may even cause respiratory discomfort. These methods are equivalent to artificially aggravating indoor air pollution. For the elderly with sensitive respiratory tract or a history of asthma, it is likely to induce respiratory disease and is not recommended.

The elderly should be allowed to stay in the appropriate room temperature to avoid other adverse effects on the body caused by too low or too high room temperature. At the same time, attention should be paid to opening windows regularly to improve indoor air quality and reduce the amount of viruses that may be present. It is recommended to increase the number of ventilation times and reduce the ventilation time, while paying attention to keeping warm.

Special times advocate frequent hand washing to prevent viral infections. However, elderly people have degenerated sebaceous gland function and are prone to dryness, so washing hands regularly is bound to aggravate chapped skin. It is recommended that hand cream be placed by the sink so that they can apply it after washing their hands.

Older adults love to walk around during the New Year holidays. This also increases their risk of being exposed to the virus. An infection in the elderly could lead to serious consequences, so during an outbreak, do not gather for meals or multiple gatherings, and do not host friends or relatives who may be from key outbreak areas. If special needs arise, visit and care for the elderly at home. Visitors should wear masks on the road, take off their coats, change their shoes, wash their hands at the door, and disinfect anything they bring with alcohol before doing anything else to avoid long-term homebound frail seniors being infected by outside visitors.

Various localities have also introduced various policies to reduce the number of elderly people going out, for example, Sichuan Province recently issued a notice requiring all mahjong parlors to suspend operations. It is recommended to spend more time with the elderly at home during the Spring Festival and to actively persuade them to reduce unnecessary going out activities. If they must go out, help them wear the right mask. Ordinary cotton masks have no protective effect. It is recommended that medical surgical masks be used as a priority, followed by medical care masks. However, the use of protective masks such as N95 or KN95 is not recommended for the elderly. These masks have a high respiratory resistance, and after long-term wear, symptoms such as chest tightness, shortness of breath and breathlessness can easily occur, and in serious cases, they can even lead to heart failure.

Seniors should try not to use crowded public transportation when traveling. It is best to walk, take a taxi or have a family member drive them. It is recommended to avoid crowds and choose places with fewer people and good ventilation, such as wearing a mask to walk in a park or outdoors. When you see someone you know, don't take off your mask and keep a distance of more than 1 meter to say hello. For seniors who like to visit food markets, three "don'ts" should be advised: don't go to markets that are not formal and have inadequate disinfection measures; don't buy poultry and seafood from unknown sources; and don't touch live poultry unprotected. Although no formal meat and seafood products have been found to transmit the virus, it is important to note that both meat and eggs must be cooked before eating. Many older adults are frugal and may use masks repeatedly. Be sure to advise that disposable medical masks should only be used once and teach older adults the proper way to put on and take off the mask. For more information, see "(1) Wearing a mask" in Chapter 3, "1. Universal precautions.

During the epidemic, it is recommended that older adults should start with a balanced diet. If there are no special dietary contraindications for the elderly, the intake of high-quality protein (eggs, soy products, fish, etc.), fresh vegetables and seasonal fruits can all be increased appropriately. However, in fact, many elderly people themselves suffer from a variety of diseases, the function of the whole body organs decreases, coupled with the usual chewing and swallowing function decreases, it is difficult to achieve the daily caloric and nutritional needs, resulting in wasting and malnutrition, thus the immune function decreases and more easily infected with viruses. Therefore, the elderly must properly improve their nutritional reserves through proper nutritional supplementation. Given that older adults have limited mobility and sometimes find it difficult to prepare nutritionally complete foods, they can also choose to take oral nutritional supplements for easier, convenient and safe nutritional supplementation. You can choose one of each of the three types of nutritional supplements and use them together: (1) oral whole nutritional supplements; (2) multivitamin-mineral supplements; and (3) high-quality protein supplements.

Some elderly people are easily misled by marketing rumors and buy some so-called "anti-viral" foods. In fact, all foods and supplements on the market that claim to prevent viruses lack clinical evidence, such as garlic, mushrooms, strawberries, red wine, lactoferrin, etc. Although they have some nutritional value to the human body, they are not anti-viral. However, like strawberries such as a balanced nutritional fruit in season, if the elderly "like", eat more is good.

If you have to go to the hospital, it is important that family members as well as the elderly are protected before going to the hospital. Wear a mask and wash your hands promptly. While in the hospital, be careful not to touch the outside of the mask, don't touch it, and wash your hands after taking off the mask. Also be careful to protect others by keeping your distance from people and remembering to block with your elbows when sneezing and coughing.




Children are also one of the susceptible groups, and the main transmission routes of infection are droplets and contact. Conjunctival transmission has also been reported, so infants and children should be more protected.

Infants cannot wear masks, so passive protection is the norm for infants under 1 year of age. Infants need to be dressed appropriately and not overly warmed or cooled. Do not feed your child after trying or chewing food with your mouth (including not feeding your child after blowing on cool food with your mouth) and do not share utensils with your child. Be sure to disinfect your child's belongings, toys and utensils regularly. If unnecessary, try to go out without your child, especially not to public places or confined spaces; try not to take public transportation when you go out and stay as far away from other people as possible (keep a distance of at least 1 meter). Wash your hands carefully before playing with your child. Parents should change their clothes and wash their hands before holding their children after coming home from a trip. The home should be regularly ventilated, and when it is ventilated, the child can be moved to another room to avoid catching a cold.

Caregivers need to take the initiative to wear a mask, do not kiss the baby, and do not cough, sneeze, or exhale into the baby. If you have to cough or sneeze be sure to cover your mouth and nose with a tissue (if it is too late to use a tissue, then apply your arm to completely cover your mouth and nose and then wash your arm thoroughly) and throw the contaminated tissue into a closed bin (bucket) immediately and wash your hands carefully with running water. Parents who have respiratory illnesses or symptoms such as fever, runny nose, coughing and sneezing should also wear a mask at home and isolate themselves properly at home.

Children should avoid going outside during this novel coronavirus pneumonia epidemic; if they must go outside, they should wear a mask when they go out, and they should wear a mask in hospitals, confined spaces, and crowded places, but not in ventilated spaces with low population density. In addition, children should be instructed to keep a distance of more than 1 meter from other people in confined spaces and crowded places; develop good hygiene habits, do not touch everywhere, and do not touch or rub the mouth, nose, eyes and other parts with unclean hands. The method of wearing mask and precautions can be found in the section of "(1) Wearing Mask" in Chapter 3 "1. General Precautions".

For children who do not like to wear masks, first of all, parents should buy disposable medical masks for children that are suitable for children, these masks will have some patterns or colors that are more acceptable to children. For younger children, parents can play role-playing, games and stories, and wear them together with the child in front of a mirror, and don't rush at first, but try a few more times to make the child feel less resistant and unfamiliar with the mask. When wearing the mask, help the child adjust the position of the mask to make the child more comfortable and less resistant. If children are unable to wear a mask, they should stay at home as much as possible, reduce going out, practice good hand hygiene, develop good and safe eating habits, and have parents do a good job of personal protection and home cleaning and disinfection ventilation to indirectly protect their children.

After children go home and take off their clothes, if there are conditions, they can use ultraviolet light or alcohol to spray their coats; if there are no such conditions, they can also take off their clothes and put them in a fixed position and change their shoes after entering the house. Then the child should be guided to wash hands carefully, hand washing methods and precautions can be found in the universal precautions section; after hand washing is completed, the face can be washed, and if the child cooperates, the nasal cavity can be washed and the mouth rinsed, and the mouth rinsed with either light salt water or water, and the child can spit it out after rinsing. However, it is worth noting that ultraviolet light can cause damage to the skin and eyes, and the ozone produced can also stimulate the respiratory tract, causing sore throat, chest tightness and coughing, which can also lead to dizziness and headache, so all people must leave the disinfection room during UV irradiation to avoid damage, and should be ventilated for some time after disinfection. In addition, the disinfection area of home UV disinfection lamps is related to their power.

Children may be seen in the emergency room if they present with fever symptoms at 39°C. ①Infants under 3 months old with a temperature >40℃ should be seen in the hospital promptly. ②Infants 3 to 6 months old, if their body temperature is below 38℃ and they eat milk and respond mentally as usual, they can monitor their body temperature and observe the general condition of the infant before considering whether to go to the hospital; if their body temperature exceeds 38℃, they should seek medical attention at any time; even if they do not have the above-mentioned conditions, but have fever for more than 24 hours, they should go to the hospital outpatient clinic. ③For children 6 months to 2 years old, if the child has only a slightly poor mental response to the fever, but plays freely after the temperature has dropped to normal, the child may be observed; if the fever lasts more than 24 hours, the child may go to the hospital for consultation. In addition to temperature, if the child has poor mental response (weak mental response even after the fever subsides), crying and difficult to soothe, decreased milk intake, vomiting, diarrhea, low urination, joint and/or muscle pain, headache, chills, coughing and wheezing, difficulty breathing, and convulsions, go to the hospital. Another easy way to determine this is to see if the child has signs or symptoms that are significantly different from usual, in addition to fever, and if so, seek immediate medical attention.

Special Note: During the current epidemic of novel coronavirus infection, children with a temperature above 37.3°C and any of the following conditions should be seen directly at the fever clinic: (i) a history of travel or residence in Wuhan 14 days prior to the onset of illness; (ii) exposure to a patient with fever and respiratory symptoms from Wuhan within 14 days prior to the onset of illness; (iii) a family with a cluster of patients with fever.

Some symptoms of novel coronavirus pneumonia are similar to those of the common cold, such as fever, weakness of the limbs, dry cough, etc. There are also cases with insignificant symptoms, or symptoms of other systems such as digestive, cardiovascular, neurological, ophthalmic symptoms, etc. Symptoms may be more atypical in newborns and infants, and once detected, the disease progresses rapidly or the observation period has been missed.

The major differences between novel coronavirus infection and common cold are: diarrhea, breathing gradually becomes difficult, such as: breathing too fast or too slow, breathing too deep or too shallow, and in infants or newborns, open-mouth breathing, wheezing, moaning, nasal flapping (nostrils opening and closing), nodding breathing, and even lip and face color changes (cyanosis) and respiratory trigeminal signs. If any of these symptoms occur, please seek immediate medical attention!

Parents with home isolation of suspected cases should try to ensure that the rooms are separated to avoid contact between suspected parents and children, and suspected parents should wear appropriate masks at home (no protective masks with breathing valves), and children should also wear appropriate masks correctly. If possible, you should choose N95 medical mask for children first, and the rest in the order of children's medical protective masks → children's medical masks → disposable masks → children's cotton masks. After contact with suspected patients, children should take the initiative to be isolated and observed at home for 14 days, no symptoms can be released from isolation but try not to go out. As soon as there are symptoms, go to the fever clinic of the pediatric department of the nearest hospital and inform the doctor of the risk factors.

For children who need to be vaccinated during the outbreak, delayed vaccination should be determined on a case-by-case basis. In principle, the delay in vaccination will not affect the effectiveness of immunization and can be replaced in time. In addition, some vaccines that need to be given several times in a row can be temporarily interrupted for some reasons, and the temporary "interruption" will not cause the previous vaccines to be "wasted. However, there are some vaccines that cannot be delayed even during an epidemic of new coronavirus infections, such as rabies vaccine, for which the first dose must be given on the day of the bite. It is recommended to pay close attention to the dynamics of childhood vaccination clinics. If you must go out, you should be protected to avoid infection.

For children with chronic illnesses that require regular review, it is important to follow the primary care physician's assessment of the child's condition and not to make any decisions. If the physician can communicate with parents through online forms to monitor the child's disease, determine the efficacy and maintain the continuity and effectiveness of treatment, the number of hospital visits can be reduced. However, if the disease does not allow, changes or even deteriorates, the child should be seen promptly. During the visit, both the child and the parents should be well protected, especially they should wear a mask throughout the visit, not touching everywhere and not touching the mouth, nose and eyes with unclean hands. If possible, have the necessary tests performed nearby and send the results to the treating doctor online to guide the next treatment.

Finally, parents are reminded to do their daily protection against some common childhood diseases, such as rhinitis, pharyngitis, tonsillitis, common cold, constipation, abdominal pain and diarrhea, to reduce the chance of hospital visits and reduce the risk of cross-infection with the virus.




During the special period of epidemic outbreak, if there are no special instructions or requirements from the government or the maternity hospital, pregnant mothers can insist on normal maternity checkups and be prepared to wear medical grade or higher masks and carry hand sanitizer or disinfectant wipes before going to the maternity hospital; do not touch the mouth, nose, eyes, etc. without washing hands; cooperate with the hospital for temperature screening, including epidemiological screening, etc.; follow the hospital's advice, such as splitting up the time slots to avoid too many pregnant women waiting together; wash hands and faces when leaving the hospital. When you go to the hospital, you should always cooperate with the hospital for temperature screening, including epidemiological screening, etc.; follow the hospital's advice, such as splitting the consultation time to avoid too many pregnant women being grouped together and reduce the waiting time or consultation time in the hospital; when you leave the hospital, you should wash your hands and face, and washing your face should include washing your ears and nose, and you should also change your external clothing. Without special problems, pregnant women whose gestational weeks are in early and middle pregnancy can extend the interval between visits to the hospital appropriately on the advice of the doctor. If a pregnant woman has a fever, it is recommended to visit the fever clinic directly first, and then, depending on the results of the examination, a series of subsequent examinations or recommendations will be given.

The early manifestations of novel coronavirus pneumonia lack characteristics and are not easily distinguishable from upper respiratory tract infections caused by the common cold or other pathogens, making it difficult to self-diagnose. If pregnant mothers have symptoms such as fever and cough, they need to pay attention to monitor their body temperature and keep records of the symptoms such as vomiting, abdominal pain, diarrhea, muscle aches, etc. Do not self-medicate, and consult your obstetrician before using medication; if the symptoms are mild and no other symptoms appear, consider dealing with them at home to avoid cross-infection at the hospital; if obstetric emergencies occur If there are symptoms of obstetric emergencies, such as vaginal bleeding, abdominal pain, abnormal fetal movement, signs of labor, etc., it is recommended that you should take good precautions and go to the hospital in time.

If a pregnant mother develops symptoms such as low fever, sore throat and cough and has risk factors such as having been to an area where the disease is endemic and possibly having been in contact with a patient with New Coronary Pneumonia, home isolation should be started immediately. When the disease worsens, symptoms such as high fever and dyspnea should be promptly seen at a fever clinic. There are not enough data to confirm the risk of maternal-fetal transmission of novel coronavirus infection. If a pregnant woman is diagnosed with novel coronavirus pneumonia, a multidisciplinary consultation should be conducted to determine whether to continue the pregnancy, taking into account the patient's specific circumstances, including gestational age and severity of illness.

If a pregnant mother has symptoms of pneumonia, she should go to the emergency room. The emergency medical staff will first prediagnose and triage pregnant mothers with fever and suspected pneumonia, take their temperature, and direct them to the designated fever clinic; at the same time, the fever clinic staff will organize a consultation with obstetricians and perform obstetric examinations, fetal heart monitoring, and ultrasound to assess the intrauterine safety of the fetus if necessary. Currently, suspected and confirmed cases of pulmonary infection in pregnancy are being seen in the obstetrics departments of medical institutions in Hubei Province at all gestational ages. Effective measures are being taken in all regions to designate medical institutions with strong comprehensive obstetric and neonatal care capabilities to provide maternal care and safe delivery services to ensure the safety of mothers and infants. There is no evidence that the virus can be transmitted to newborns. It is recommended that the baby be isolated for 10 days after birth and not breastfed while under close supervision.



Medical personnel should follow the standard precautionary principles and do a good job in hospital infection control such as personal protection, hand hygiene, ward management, environmental ventilation, cleaning and disinfection of object surfaces and medical waste management according to the risks that may be transmitted by medical operations to avoid hospital infections to the greatest extent possible. The following points need to be noted during daily treatment activities.

(1) engaged in medical treatment activities, medical and nursing staff should wear medical masks, and regular replacement.

(2) Medical staff at the pre-care triage office must wear overalls, work caps, and medical surgical masks.

(3) Give patients and accompanying family members to wear medical surgical masks during the face consultation and keep a certain distance. Do the effective ventilation of the consultation room.

(4) Medical and nursing staff in fever clinics, respiratory clinics, infectious disease departments and isolation wards should wear work clothes, disposable isolation clothing, work caps and medical surgical masks during daily consultation activities and room visits.

(5) Protective masks and goggles or protective face screens should be worn when collecting respiratory samples.

(6) Contact with blood, body fluids, secretions or excretions should be added when wearing latex gloves.

(7) Medical protective masks, goggles or protective face screens, latex gloves, medical gowns (disposable impermeable barrier gowns can be added) and breathing hoods should be worn when performing tracheal intubation, bronchoscopy, airway care and suctioning, etc., where aerosol or splash operations may occur.

(8) It is forbidden to leave the contaminated area wearing personal protective equipment in order to avoid cross-infection in each partition. Strictly follow the process of putting on and taking off equipment (see "Process of putting on and taking off protective equipment for medical personnel").


The process of putting on and taking off protective equipment for medical personnel


A. Medical staff to enter the isolation ward to wear protective equipment procedures
(A) medical staff through the staff special channel into the clean area, carefully wash their hands after wearing medical protective masks, disposable hats or cloth caps, change of work shoes and socks, the conditions can be replaced by hand-brushing clothes and pants.
(ii) Wear work clothes before entering the potentially contaminated area, and wear gloves to enter the potentially contaminated area if the skin on the hands is broken or suspected of having damage.
(C) before entering the contaminated area, take off work clothes for protective clothing or isolation clothing, plus wear disposable hats and disposable medical surgical masks (wearing a total of two layers of hats, masks), protective glasses, gloves, shoe covers.
Second, medical personnel leave the isolation area to take off protective equipment procedures
(A) medical personnel should disinfect their hands before leaving the contaminated area, in turn, take off protective glasses, outer disposable medical surgical mask and outer disposable hat, protective clothing or isolation clothing, shoe covers, gloves and other items, divided into special containers, hand disinfection again, enter the potentially contaminated area, change to wear work clothes.
(b) Before leaving the potentially contaminated area and entering the clean area, wash hands and hand disinfection, take off work clothes, wash hands and hand disinfection.
(C) before leaving the clean area, hand washing and hand disinfection, remove the lining disposable cap or cloth cap, lining medical protective mask, shower and dressing, and oral, nasal and external ear canal cleaning.
(iv) Wash and disinfect hands immediately after each contact with the patient.
(E) disposable medical surgical masks, medical protective masks, protective clothing or isolation clothing and other protective supplies are contaminated with patient blood, body fluids, secretions, etc. should be replaced immediately.
(vi) personal hygiene disposal should be carried out before work, and attention to respiratory and mucous membrane protection.





Patients who unfortunately develop novel coronavirus pneumonia not only suffer physically, but also undergo tremendous psychological stress. Due to the lack of specific treatment and the highly contagious nature of the disease, patients not only face an unprecedented fear of death, but also fear for the safety of family and friends with whom they have had contact, and are plunged into a deep sense of self-blame. For each patient, this is a sudden life crisis. At this time, if you feel anxiety, fear, anger, helplessness, etc., are normal emotional reactions, the first thing patients should do is to adapt to the hospital environment and treatment process, trust the medical staff, and actively cooperate with treatment; then try to control negative emotions, such as pessimism, self-blame, self-hatred, tension; promote positive emotions, such as self-confidence, optimism, courage, etc.

In addition, there are specific measures that patients can take to "help themselves".

(1) The seriousness of the situation should be evaluated correctly. Because novel coronavirus pneumonia is a serious infectious disease that requires hospitalization and isolation and a period of time away from family members, it is important to be prepared to endure isolation. This is especially important for patients who are dependent and young.

(2) Actively obtain information about the disease and treatment, and correctly evaluate your condition and estimate the prognosis. Neither underestimate the disease, full of care; nor blindly exaggerate, thinking that once the disease, will certainly die. So far, patients with novel coronavirus pneumonia have been cured and very few have died. Learn about medical care, learn to take care of yourself, and report any discomfort to your health care provider.

(3) Learn to express your inner needs and feelings. Vent negative emotions such as helplessness, disappointment and dissatisfaction in a timely manner, do not keep them inside and do not worry about others laughing at your cowardice. You can communicate with your patients, exchange emotions and views, and get stable emotional support from each other; or take the initiative to consult with health care professionals to get professional guidance.

(4) Determine specific and limited life goals according to the actual situation. For example, how to cooperate with the hospital to eliminate symptoms and restore health as soon as possible, which is the most important thing at present; and not to think too much about things outside the hospital, such as family arrangements.

(5) By evaluating the disease and estimating the prognosis, it is necessary to revise the life goals before the disease and rebuild realistic and feasible future life goals. It is important to be prepared for the possibility that the previously established work and study plans or life arrangements may change due to the disease.



Home isolates, who have not yet been diagnosed, often bear greater psychological stress. Therefore, home isolates should actively adjust their mindset and adopt coping strategies, which on the one hand can reduce the adverse emotions that trigger somatization symptoms, and on the other hand can help their immune system to improve to fight against the virus.

(1) Understanding of real and reliable information and knowledge

It helps us to collect as much authoritative information as possible, to learn in detail about the disease, and to have a clear understanding of the real epidemic, the possibility of transmission, the damage of the disease to the body and the mortality rate, etc. This helps us to be psychologically stable.

(2) Facing up to your situation and accepting your bad feelings

Feeling fear, nervousness, irritability, loneliness, aggression, anger, self-blame and shame, paranoia, depression, etc., and even self-blame and guilt when pessimistic, complaining about others and blaming the government when angry, etc., are all our reactions to stress, and each of us will appear more or less at this time, and these will slowly subside over time, they do not indicate that something is wrong with our brain or body, do not let Don't be too afraid and unaccepting of these uncomfortable feelings, which can lead to a vicious cycle of tension, learn to make peace with these symptoms, and don't force yourself not to react emotionally and to be completely tension-free.

(3) Confronting the situation of accepting isolation

It is natural that isolated people will have a hard time, but this is to better protect themselves and others. We also have to deal with the intentional avoidance and distancing of others, or those who complain about our anger because they are too afraid of the virus, which may give us an inappropriate sense of shame that we are "ominous" and "annoying," but we need to understand that it is not us who are being avoided and distanced, but the infectious virus. But we need to understand that it is not us who are avoided and distanced, but the contagious virus. The struggle between human beings and diseases and disasters is eternal, and in every such struggle, there are always people with a deep sense of responsibility who sacrifice their interests, their freedom, and even their lives for the benefit of society and the public at large. We are still under observation, and even if we are unfortunate enough to be infected, there is a great possibility that we will be cured.

(4) Seek resources to deal with stress

More communication with their relatives, friends, colleagues, organizations, etc., although not face to face, but completely through modern means of communication such as telephone, SMS, e-mail, online chat, etc., each other to confide in each other's feelings, mutual greetings, comfort, support and encouragement are beneficial to us, think that a person in the face of pain we will be very lonely, feel that many people in the face of difficulties together with us we will feel more powerful.

(5) Actively cooperate with scientific and effective treatment

Although there are no specific medications for the new coronavirus, it is important to follow medical treatments, ensure adequate nutrition, maintain the function of all body systems, prevent complications, and it is also very important to have a positive and optimistic attitude towards the disease, fully believing and appreciating our body's ability to coordinate and recover itself.

(6) Preserve as much of normal life as possible

The impact of isolation on life is often multifaceted, work, study, recreation and leisure, diet, etc., but we should live as normally as possible with the necessary scientific treatment and protective measures, on the one hand, making the loss reduced to a minimum, on the other hand, will also make the emotional recovery as soon as possible, normal life to have a normal mood.

(7) Commitment to constructive things

It is often said that "turning grief into strength", and there is no more mature way for people in a state of pain than to sublimate this painful emotion into a constructive motivation, a famous psychologist wrote a monumental work of psychology in a Nazi concentration camp, and the poet Goethe completed "The Trouble with Young Werther" in the days of lost love. "The Trouble with Young Werther". The virus makes us suffer from illness and isolation, we have to participate more actively in the fight against the virus, trying to cooperate with isolation and treatment, and keep working or creating when possible.

(8) Finding the positive meaning in adversity

We can take the isolation as a short vacation, so that we can temporarily get away from the hustle and bustle of the crowd, calmly think about the problems we didn't have time to think about before, read the books and entertainment we want to read, listen to our favorite music, and enjoy a short period of solitude and separation.

(9) Make good use of the help of professional psychology

If necessary, you can consult your condition online to get scientific and reasonable advice, or call a psychological intervention or counseling hotline when self-adjustment is difficult.



The duties of medical workers in this epidemic dictate that they have the most important and at the same time the most dangerous task in this battle. Under heavy pressure, the most common reactions of medical personnel included the following.

(1) They are afraid that their family members will worry about them, so they will always try to find time to contact their family members and report to them. When they hear that their family members are in trouble, they will feel sad and blame themselves for not doing more for them.

(2) As they are busy with a lot of clinical work every day, they will be physically and psychologically exhausted. If the information is not well communicated, they will feel confused about the work prospect, think that the work is long and indefinite, and become pessimistic and averse to doing clinical work every day.

(3) When seeing a patient in great pain and not being able to save his life despite his best efforts, he will psychologically feel self-defeated and think that he is not a good doctor or nurse, and strongly blame himself and feel guilty.

(4) When seeing other health care workers in the ward are busy treating patients, they will feel that others are stronger than they are and think they are the most vulnerable person, thus not accepting their vulnerability, not daring to admit and express their painful emotions, and not wanting to communicate with others, worrying that they will be looked down upon by others after they tell their feelings, often bearing the pain alone, relying on reason and will to suppress and control As a result, they feel more painful and helpless.

In the above-mentioned situations, health care workers become anxious, cannot control their temper often, and become impatient with patients and colleagues. When encountering complaints from patients, they feel aggrieved and unappreciated. These psychological reactions can largely affect the mutual cooperation and efficiency of health care workers. Therefore, they should receive timely psychological counseling and help. At this time, society, hospitals and individuals can take some necessary interventions to maintain a good psychological state and actively make good psychological adjustment, which can both maintain combat effectiveness and effectively prevent trauma and stress disorders.

Societies and hospitals can.

(1) Eliminate the worries of front-line medical workers as much as possible, and arrange volunteers to assist their families in case of family difficulties, so that medical workers can put their minds at ease into their work.

(2) For health care workers already working on the front lines of the epidemic, schedule their shifts rationally and plan ahead so that everyone has adequate psychological expectations of their work and avoid ad hoc arrangements; maintain proper rest and ensure adequate sleep and diet. Provide rest and sleeping areas for self-isolation without returning home.

(3) For health care workers who are about to enter the frontline of an epidemic, it is recommended that a preventive interview for stress be conducted along with pre-service training. The purpose of the group interview is to: openly discuss internal feelings; support and reassure; mobilize resources; and help the person prepare psychologically (cognitively and emotionally) for the stress.

(4) Make health care workers aware of normal reactions to catastrophic events and provide timely assistance when the following signs occur: difficulty communicating thoughts, difficulty remembering instructions, difficulty maintaining balance, arguments over trivial matters, difficulty making decisions, narrow attention span, unnecessary risk-taking behavior, tremor/headache/nausea, limited vision/blurred hearing, cold or flu-like symptoms, disorientation or mental confusion , difficulty concentrating, purposeless movements, easily frustrated, difficulty solving problems, difficulty calming down when off duty, refusal to carry out orders, refusal to leave the scene, increased use of drugs/alcohol, appearing clumsier than usual, etc.

Health care professionals should also be aware of their state and help themselves and others in a timely manner.

(1) Allow yourself to show weakness. When you feel that you cannot bear the pressure, please tell the leader in charge in time and do things according to your ability. Also allow yourself to cry when you are sad and moved. Doctors and nurses are not steel, they also have emotions, they also have anxiety, fear, anxiety and fear. Be firm and tell yourself: In such a major public event, in such a harsh battlefield, it is normal and natural for me to have these emotions, and I will recover when such a stressful event is over. Never self-depreciate, or even rise to self-worth and lose hope in life.

(2) Limit working hours; drink plenty of water and eat healthful foods such as fresh fruit; take frequent short breaks away from the site if possible.

(3) In your spare time, perform appropriate muscle relaxation exercises, i.e., gradually tense and relax each muscle group, so that the muscles can experience the sensation of tension and relaxation. Or perform deep breathing exercises, meditation, positive thinking, etc. Related instructional phrases and information can be found on the Internet.

(4) Talk about what you have seen and how you feel about doing your job; stay in touch with your family and friends; and buddy up with another colleague so you can monitor the stress you are experiencing.

(5) If stress symptoms have occurred, switch jobs: from a high stress position to a low stress position, or from the field to a regular position if that works; consult and seek help through the unit.

(6) In case of emergency, such as sudden transfer of post, major casualty accident, death of a colleague, death of a patient, suicide of a patient, etc., professionals should be asked to conduct a group interview for serious incidents.

(7) If you experience inability to sleep, depression, anxiety, panic attacks, etc., which cannot be relieved for 2 weeks and affect your work, you may seek consultation with a professional psychiatric psychologist. One-on-one psychological counseling and group psychological counseling can be carried out. The above psychological counseling can be conducted remotely to prevent infection of psychological intervention personnel, such as voice, video, telephone and other various methods.



Faced with the continuous spread and development of the Newcastle pneumonia epidemic, every member of the general public in the midst of the epidemic is faced with the unknown risk of the disease. According to reports, the general public has strong emotional reactions to the epidemic such as worry, fear, and anger, and positive emotions are significantly reduced, and many people are even experiencing significant disruptions in their normal lives due to the persistence of negative emotions and difficulties in getting rid of them. The following methods can improve the general public's ability to self-regulate at home, so that they can respond positively and rationally to the epidemic.

(1) Reasonable attention to the epidemic, "regularly" rather than "at all times".

Information management is a change in the traditional way of handling information about the epidemic and a way to regulate the management of the epidemic and its psychological impact. The public learns information about the outbreak and related protective knowledge from formal channels, takes active and effective protective measures, and protects itself well. Frequent reports are intended to draw attention to the disease, but there is no need to panic about it, and the actual severity of the disease will not be increased by frequent reports. You can set an "information alarm clock" and spend a few minutes every half day to pay attention to the epidemic information, and the rest of the day for daily activities such as sports, work, housework or recreation, so that you can get a normal rest and enjoy your mood while keeping abreast of the epidemic. With the necessary protection, a rich and regular life will give us a stronger "psychological immunity" and the strength and confidence to face the changing and unknown risks.

(2) Maintain social ties and give support to each other.

Close family ties and social support are an important source of "security" for people who feel isolated and helpless in the face of the risks of an epidemic. Close family ties and social support are important sources of "safety". It is advisable to communicate with friends to encourage each other, communicate with each other and strengthen psychological support. It is also important to avoid unprotected face-to-face meetings and to encourage communication by phone, Internet, and cell phone text messaging to avoid the spread of novel pneumonia. For vulnerable people, such as children and the elderly, try to give more encouragement and life care. As prevention and control are prolonged, support for each other can enable us to cope with adversity more permanently.

(3) Monitor psychological power and help yourself before helping others.

We sometimes feel frustrated or inadequate in the face of difficult situations in areas with severe epidemics. It is recommended that this group of people take a "psychological battery monitor" and spend one minute every half day to assess their current emotional state (on a scale of 0 to 100, with 100 being positive and energetic, and 0 being physically and emotionally exhausted and severely depleted). If you are already depleted, helpless and frustrated, adjust the pace and intensity of your assistance, or take a break to "recharge". If you feel emotional and physical abnormalities and discomfort, seek help or medical attention to avoid depletion of your "psychological power" due to continuous commitment.

In daily life, it is important to look at life positively and act positively to establish good living and hygiene habits. Pay attention to a good diet, ensure sleep, accept your fear, tension, anxiety and other emotions, and use reasonable methods of catharsis. Do not resort to denial, avoidance and withdrawal, over-reliance on others, blame and complaint, diversion and other poor coping methods, do not try to relieve tension through the use of alcohol and tobacco, and do not engage in tantrums, impulsive injuries, self-inflicted suicides and other behaviors. When the spread of the epidemic is effectively contained, you should not be blindly optimistic, relax your vigilance, or neglect protection.



With the increasing severity of the new coronavirus pneumonia, children must have a lot of curiosity and wonder why the planned winter vacation trip is cancelled? Why do I have to wear a mask when I go out? Why is the start of school delayed? With all this going on, it is important to find the right way to communicate with children in a way that does not create great fear and at the same time is understood and valued.

First of all, when facing children, parents should adjust their self-state, maintain emotional stability and regular and orderly life. Children often observe and experience the world through their parents' emotions and behaviors, so parents should promptly detect and regulate their own anxiety and fear, and try to present a stable, positive and powerful side in front of their children to help them establish a sense of security. Parents can consciously arrange some study, indoor exercise, housework, parent-child games, etc. to help their children adjust their life routine, allocate time in a reasonable and scientific way, and increase the emotional communication between relatives to bring confidence and security to their children.

Parents should accept their children's emotional reactions to current situations and be more patient in explaining the dangers of the outside world to them, conveying information in a way they can understand and in words they can understand. Parents can encourage their children to express their thoughts and emotional feelings in the way they are used to, help them identify and name their emotions such as "fear, dread, and happiness", help them express their feelings through drawing and doodling, allow them to cry and express their fears, and help them recognize that fear and dread are normal Emotional reactions. You can also use storytelling and games to help your child understand the concepts of viruses and illnesses, learn to face them with the right attitude, increase awareness and develop good habits, and become more understanding of mom and dad's decisions.

Parents may need to spend more time with their children, giving love and care during the special times when the epidemic is raging.




Pay attention to ensure nutritional balance, adhere to exercise, to achieve scientific nutrition.

(1) adequate energy, cereals and potatoes to ensure that the daily intake of 250 to 400g, including rice, flour, mixed grains such as corn, buckwheat and potatoes. Can be moderate consumption of milk (preferably yogurt products), soy foods, adhere to a daily egg, milk and milk products 300g, so that more than the usual 20g of high-quality protein, to ensure that the "resistance". Do not eat wild animals.


(2) Eat fresh vegetables and fruits every day, not less than 5 kinds of vegetables per day, preferably more than 500g. Half of them are dark-colored fruits and vegetables. Fruits to ensure 200 to 350g. fresh fruits and vegetables, as well as nuts and other plant crops rich in B vitamins, vitamin C, vitamin E, etc., has a strong antioxidant, immune regulating effect.

(3) Drink plenty of water in moderation, 1500 to 2000ml per day, many times in small amounts and effectively; you can drink warm boiled water or light tea. Before and after meals, vegetable soup, fish soup, chicken soup, etc. is also a good choice.

(4) A wide variety of food types, sources and colors, no less than 20 kinds of food per day; do not be partial to food, meat and vegetarian mix.

(5) rich sources of edible fats and oils, and moderate increase in the intake of essential fatty acids. Cooking with vegetable oils rich in n-9 monounsaturated fatty acids and hard fruits and oily foods, such as peanuts, walnuts, pistachios, etc.. The total fat energy supply ratio reaches 25% to 30% of the total dietary energy.

(6) Do not diet and do not lose weight during the novel coronavirus pneumonia epidemic.

(7) Regular rest and adequate sleep, ensuring at least 7 hours of sleep per day.

(8) Carry out individual types of physical exercise for a cumulative time of at least one hour per day, and do not participate in group sports activities.

(9) During the epidemic of novel coronavirus pneumonia, it is recommended to supplement health food products such as compound vitamins, minerals and deep-sea fish oil in appropriate amounts.

(10) For patients with inadequate diet, the elderly and chronic wasting underlying diseases, it is recommended to increase commercial enteral nutrition (special medical food) with no less than 500 additional calories per day.



Adhere to a reasonable diet and improve your resistance through balanced nutrition. Refer to the "Dietary Guidelines for Chinese Residents (2016)" issued by the Chinese Nutrition Society for nutritional "prescriptions". Under the current special circumstances, the following entries are also applicable to the general population.


(1) energy to be sufficient, cereal and potatoes to ensure that the daily intake of 250 ~ 400g, including rice, flour, miscellaneous grains such as corn, buckwheat and potatoes, etc.. Can moderate consumption of milk, class (preferably yogurt products), soy, in food, adhere to a daily egg, milk and milk products 300g, so that more than the usual 20g of high-quality protein, to ensure that "resistance. Do not eat wild animals.


(2) Eat fresh vegetables and fruits every day, not less than 5 kinds of vegetables per day, preferably more than 500g. Half of them are dark-colored fruits and vegetables. Fruits to ensure 200 to 350g. fresh fruits and vegetables, as well as nuts and other plant crops rich in B vitamins, vitamin C, vitamin E, etc., has a strong antioxidant, immune regulating effect.


(3) Drink plenty of water in moderation, 1500 to 2000ml per day, many times in small amounts and effectively; you can drink warm boiled water or light tea. Before and after meals, vegetable soup, fish soup, chicken soup, etc. is also a good choice.


(4) Moderate increase in the intake of high quality fats, including cooking with vegetable oils rich in n-9 fatty acids and hard fruits and oily foods such as peanuts, walnuts, etc., the total fat energy supply ratio of 25% to 30% of the total dietary energy.


(5) Ensure adequate water intake, 1500 to 2000ml per day, and drink water in small amounts many times and effectively; you can drink warm boiled water or light tea. Before and after meals, vegetable soup, fish soup, chicken soup, etc. are also good choices.


(6) Don't touch, buy and eat wild animals; pay attention to the kitchen food handling to separate raw and cooked food, animal food should be cooked and boiled thoroughly; family meals, the implementation of meal sharing system or the use of common spoons, common chopsticks and other measures to avoid mutual infection with family members. Prohibit smoking and alcohol, and avoid spicy and stimulating foods.


(7) Fresh vegetables, fruits and nuts and other plant crops are rich in B vitamins, vitamin C and vitamin E, which have strong antioxidant and immune regulating effects and should be supplemented with attention. Nutrient supplements can also be added in appropriate amounts.


(8) Soybeans and products, mushroom food, goji berries, astragalus and other foods contain flavonoids, betaine and other antioxidant substances, lean meat is rich in protein, L-carnitine are helpful in strengthening resistance.


(9) Those with poor appetite who do not eat enough should pay attention to the supplementation of B vitamins and vitamin C, vitamin A, vitamin D and other micronutrients.


(10) Maintain a moderate amount of outdoor activities (no group activities) and increase the time of light.


